Platelet count is not a predictor of the presence or development of gastroesophageal varices in cirrhosis.Current guidelines recommend esophagogastroduodenoscopy (EGD) in patients with cirrhosis to screen for gastroesophageal varices (GEV). Thrombocytopenia has been proposed as a noninvasive test to predict the presence of GEV. There is no agreement regarding a specific platelet count (PLT) that can reliably predict GEV. The present longitudinal study aims to (1) further investigate the relationship between varices and PLT at the time of endoscopy, (2) investigate whether changes in PLT from the baseline over time can predict the development of GEV, and (3) investigate whether changes in PLT correlate with the hepatic venous pressure gradient (HVPG). A secondary analysis was conducted for 213 subjects with compensated cirrhosis with portal hypertension but without GEV enrolled in a randomized, placebo-controlled, double-blind trial of a nonselective beta-blocker used to prevent GEV. PLTs were obtained every 3 months, and HVPG measurements and EGD were done annually. The PLTs were compared between subjects who did and did not develop GEV. In a median follow-up of 54.9 months, 84 patients developed GEV. PLT was greater than 150,000 in 15% of patients at the development of GEV. A receiver operating curve did not show any PLT with high sensitivity or specificity for the presence of GEV. Subjects with clinically insignificant portal hypertension (HVPG < 10 mm Hg) whose PLT remained greater than 100,000 had a 2-fold reduction in the occurrence of GEV (P = 0.0374). A significant correlation was found between HVPG and PLT at the baseline, year 1, and year 5 (P < 0.0001).Cross-sectional or longitudinal evaluations of PLTs are inadequate noninvasive markers for GEV. Patients with mild portal hypertension whose PLT remains greater than 100,000 have significantly less risk of GEV. Although HVPG correlates somewhat with PLT, changes in PLT cannot be used as a surrogate for HVPG changes.[Noninvasive diagnosis of esophageal varices in cirrhotic patients].Variceal bleeding is a frequent and serious complication of cirrhosis. Early detection of varices by videogastroscope (VGC) is recommended in all patients with cirrhosis to determine the need for prophylactic treatment. Have been described noninvasive markers of the presence of esophageal varices, which could prevent the realization of VGC for that purpose.To determine and compare noninvasive (longitudinal diameter of spleen, platelet count, platelet reason / spleen) as predictors of the presence of esophageal varices.We retrospectively studied 125 patients with cirrhosis from any cause. They had VGC, blood count and abdominal ultrasonography. The diagnostic accuracy for determining the presence of esophageal varices or large varices according to the different variables was studied using the area under the ROC curve (AUROC).The prevalence of esophageal varices was 63.2% and 42.4% were diagnosed with large varices. The reason platelets/spleen and platelet count showed an AUROC of 0.74 for the detection of esophageal varices. The cut-off for the ratio platelets / spleen was 1.010 (sensitivity 72.15% and specificity 71.74%) for the presence of varices and 870 for the presence of clinically significant varices (sensitivity 62.26% and specificity 62.50%). The analysis according to these breakpoints showed that 23.6% of patients with scores higher than 1,010 had large varices and 45% of patients with values lower than 870 had not large varices.Although the reason platelets/spleen showed an AUROC acceptable, its implementation would entail a risk of not diagnosing large varices in almost a quarter of the population studied.Spleen stiffness measurement using Fibroscan for the noninvasive assessment of esophageal varices in liver cirrhosis patients.Splenomegaly in a common finding in liver cirrhosis that should determine changes in the spleen's density because of portal and splenic congestion and/or because of tissue hyperplasia and fibrosis. These changes might be quantified by elastography, so the aim of the study was to investigate whether spleen stiffness measured by transient elastography varies as liver disease progresses and whether this would be a suitable method for the noninvasive evaluation of the presence of esophageal varices.One hundred and ninety-one patients (135 liver cirrhosis, 39 chronic hepatitis and 17 healthy controls) were evaluated by transient elastography for measurements of spleen and liver stiffness. Cirrhotic patients also underwent upper endoscopy for the diagnosis of esophageal varices.Spleen stiffness showed higher values in liver cirrhosis patients as compared with chronic hepatitis and with controls: 60.96 vs 34.49 vs 22.01 KPa (P<0.0001). In the case of liver cirrhosis, spleen stiffness was significantly higher in patients with varices as compared with those without (63.69 vs 47.78 KPa, P<0.0001), 52.5 KPa being the best cut-off value, with an area under the receiver operating characteristic of 0.74. Using both liver and spleen stiffness measurement we correctly predicted the presence of esophageal varices with 89.95% diagnostic accuracy.Spleen stiffness can be assessed using transient elastography, its value increasing as the liver disease progresses. In liver cirrhosis patients spleen stiffness can predict the presence, but not the grade of esophageal varices. Esophageal varices' presence can be better predicted if both spleen and liver stiffness measurements are used.Non-invasive predictors of esophageous varices in children and adolescents with chronic liver disease or extrahepatic portal venous obstruction.To identify non-invasive predictors of esophageal varices in children and adolescents with chronic liver disease or extrahepatic portal venous obstruction (EHPVO).53 patients younger than 20 years with chronic liver disease or EHPVO and no history of bleeding or prophylactic treatment of esophageal varices (EV) were assessed. They were divided into 2 groups: group I (35 with chronic liver disease) and group II (18 with EHPVO). Their blood count, international normalized ratio (INR), albumin, bilirubin, abdominal ultrasonography and upper endoscopy results were taken. A splenic index was determined by dividing the patients' spleen dimension by its uppermost limit according to their age. The variables were compared to EV presence or not. Univariate (chi-square test, Fischer's exact test and Wilcoxon exact test) and multivariate (logistic regression) analyses were performed. A receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve was constructed and the area under the ROC curve was calculated.EV were observed in 48.5% of group I patients and in 83.3% of group II patients. Low platelet count (p = 0.0015), splenomegaly (p = 0.0003) and splenic index (p = 0.0007) were statistically significant predictors of EV among group I patients. The multivariate analysis showed low platelet count (odds = 21.7) as an independent predictor of EV in patients with chronic liver disease.Platelet count, splenic index and platelet-splenic index ratio were predictors of EV in children and adolescents with chronic liver disease. There were no EV predictors among group II patients.Prevalence and predictors of esophageal varices in patients with primary biliary cirrhosis.Esophageal varices and bleeding are among the most feared complications of primary biliary cirrhosis (PBC). We aimed to determine the prevalence of esophageal varices in patients with PBC, to evaluate noninvasive markers of esophageal varices in this population, and to validate the results in an independent set of patients.Data were collected on all patients with PBC seen for the first time at the University of Florida (study group) and at Case Western Reserve University hospitals (cross-validation group) during 7 consecutive years. Logistic regression analysis was used to identify independent predictors of esophageal varices. The best cut-off values were calculated based on receiver operating characteristic curves. The diagnostic accuracy of the independent predictors of esophageal varices identified in the study group were retested in the cross-validation group.Of 210 patients with PBC seen at the University of Florida, 113 had an endoscopy and 49.6% (56 of 113) were found to have esophageal varices. After excluding 22 patients with a history of variceal bleeding, data on 91 patients were analyzed. Thirty-four patients had esophageal varices (37%). Multivariate analysis revealed that a platelet count of less than 140,000 (odds ratio, 7.6; 95% confidence interval, 1.6-37) and a Mayo risk score of 4.5 or greater (odds ratio, 10.6; 95% confidence interval, 1.8-62) were independent predictors of esophageal varices. The diagnostic accuracy of these predictors was confirmed in an independent set of patients.Among patients with PBC, a platelet count of less than 140,000 and/or a Mayo risk score of 4.5 or greater appears to identify those patients more likely to benefit from a screening endoscopy.Platelet count to spleen diameter ratio for the diagnosis of esophageal varices: Is it feasible?To study the value of platelet count to spleen diameter ratio as a noninvasive parameter for diagnosing esophageal varices (EVs) in liver cirrhosis.The laboratory and ultrasonographic variables were prospectively evaluated in 150 patients with liver cirrhosis. Only stable patients were included in the study. Patients with active gastrointestinal bleeding at the time of admission were excluded. All patients underwent screening upper gastrointestinal endoscopy.The platelet count, spleen diameter and platelet count to spleen diameter ratio in patients with EVs were significantly different from patients without EVs. The platelet count to spleen diameter ratio had the highest accuracy among the three parameters. By applying receiver operating characteristic curves, a platelet count to spleen diameter ratio cut-off value of 1014 was obtained, which gave positive and negative predictive values of 95.4% and 95.1%, respectively. The accuracy of this cut-off value as evaluated by applying receiver operating characteristic curves was 0.942 (95% CI 0.890 to 0.995).Among the noninvasive parameters studied, platelet count to spleen diameter ratio had the highest accuracy for diagnosing EVs. However, the evidence for the noninvasive diagnosis is not yet sufficient to replace endoscopy as a diagnostic screening tool for EVs in all cirrhotic patients. The platelet count to spleen diameter ratio may be a useful tool for diagnosing EVs in liver cirrhosis noninvasively when endoscopy facilities are not available.Use of the platelet count/spleen diameter ratio for the noninvasive diagnosis of esophageal varices in patients with schistosomiasis.In patients with liver cirrhosis, the platelet count/spleen diameter ratio has been validated as a parameter for the noninvasive diagnosis of esophageal varices. Schistosoma infection is a frequent cause of portal hypertension in Middle Eastern countries, and is associated with the development of esophageal varices. In this study we aimed to evaluate the platelet count/spleen diameter ratio as a noninvasive tool for the prediction of the presence of esophageal varices in patients with schistosoma-related chronic liver disease.Forty-three patients with hepatosplenic schistosomiasis underwent upper digestive endoscopy to check for the presence of esophageal varices. Furthermore, all patients underwent abdominal ultrasonography, and maximum spleen diameter (in mm) was measured. The platelet count/spleen diameter ratio was calculated in all patients.Esophageal varices were found in 31 patients (72%). Age and gender were not significantly different between patients with and without varices. In patients with varices, median platelet count (82,000/μL versus 172,000/μL, P < 0.0001) and platelet count/spleen diameter ratio (571 versus 1651, P < 0.0001) were significantly lower, while spleen diameter (147 mm versus 109 mm, P = 0.0006) was significantly larger. In multivariate analysis, the platelet count/spleen diameter ratio was the only parameter independently associated with the presence of varices (P < 0.0001).In this study we have validated the use of the platelet count/spleen diameter ratio for the noninvasive diagnosis of esophageal varices in patients with portal hypertension caused by schistosoma infection. In these patients, the platelet count/spleen diameter ratio might be used to allow better rationalization of medical resources and use of endoscopy.Factors predicting the presence of esophageal or gastric varices in patients with advanced liver disease.Recently it has been recommended that all cirrhotic patients without previous variceal hemorrhage undergo endoscopic screening to detect varices and that those with large varices should be treated with beta-blockers (American College of Gastroenterology guidelines). However, endoscopic screening only of patients at highest risk for varices may be the most cost effective.Ninety-eight patients without a history of variceal hemorrhage underwent esophagogastroduodenoscopy as part of a liver transplant evaluation. Univariate/multivariate analysis was used to evaluate associations between the presence of varices and patient characteristics including etiology of liver disease, Child-Pugh class, physical findings (spider angiomata, splenomegaly, and ascites), encephalopathy, laboratory parameters (prothrombin time, albumin, bilirubin, BUN, creatinine, and platelets), and abdominal ultrasound findings (portal vein diameter/flow, splenomegaly, and ascites).The causes of cirrhosis among the 67 men and 31 women (mean age, 48 yr) included 28% Hepatitis C/alcoholism, 25% Hepatitis C, 13% alcoholism, 9% primary sclerosing cholangitis/primary biliary cirrhosis, 9% cryptogenic, 6% Hepatitis B, 1% Hepatitis B and C, and 9% other. Patients were Child-Pugh class A 34%, B 51%, and C 15%. Endoscopic findings included esophageal varices in 68% of patients (30% were large), gastric varices in 15%, and portal hypertensive gastropathy in 58%. Platelet count <88,000 was the only parameter identified by univariate/multivariate analysis (p < 0.05) as associated with the presence of large esophageal varices (odds ratio 5.5; 95% confidence interval 1.8-20.6) or gastric varices (odds ratio 5; 95% confidence interval 1.4-23).Platelet count <88,000 is associated with the presence of esophagogastric varices. A large prospective study is needed to verify and validate these findings and may allow identification of a group of patients who would most benefit from endoscopic screening for varices.Correlation between splenomegaly and oesophageal varices in patients with liver cirrhosis.Derivation of a clinical prediction rule for the noninvasive diagnosis of varices in children.Identification of children who are at high risk for having varices using noninvasive tests would enable the selection of children for future studies of primary prophylaxis of variceal hemorrhage, but this has been inadequately studied. The objective of the study was to derive a noninvasive clinical prediction rule that is able to identify children with esophageal varices.Fifty-one consecutive children with liver disease or portal hypertension who underwent endoscopy were included in the present retrospective study. At endoscopy, variceal size was graded on a 4-point Likert scale. Results of physical examination, blood tests, and abdominal ultrasound scan (USS) were recorded. Spleen length on USS was expressed as a standard deviation score (z score). A descriptive univariate analysis was performed on variables that were potentially associated with esophageal varices and multivariate logistic regression was then modeled to derive a clinical prediction rule.Esophageal varices were found in 17 of the 51 children (33%). Variables found to differ significantly between children with and without varices included platelet/spleen-length z score ratio (P < 0.001), platelet count (P < 0.001), international normalized ratio (P = 0.001), aspartate aminotransferase/alanine aminotransferase ratio (P = 0.002), and albumin (P = 0.003). Using multivariate logistic regression, a model with platelet count, spleen length z score, and albumin as the independent variables had the best fit. Area under the receiver operating characteristic curve for this clinical prediction rule was 0.93 (95% confidence interval 0.85-0.99), sensitivity 94%, specificity 81%, positive predictive value 0.83, negative predictive value 0.94, positive likelihood ratio 5, and negative likelihood ratio 0.06.This clinical prediction rule is a simple noninvasive measure that may identify children at high risk for esophageal varices. A prospective validation study is in progress.A novel model to predict esophageal varices in patients with compensated cirrhosis using acoustic radiation force impulse elastography.Few noninvasive methods can accurately identify esophageal varices (EVs) in patients with compensated cirrhosis. We developed and validated a novel, acoustic radiation force impulse (ARFI) elastography-based prediction model for high-risk EVs (HEVs) in patients with compensated cirrhosis.A total of 143 patients with compensated cirrhosis between February, 2010 and February, 2013 (training set) and 148 between June, 2010 and May, 2013 (validation set) who underwent ARFI elastography and endoscopy were prospectively recruited. Independent predictors of HEVs were used to construct a prediction model.Based on multivariate analysis, we developed two new statistical models, a varices risk score and ARFI-spleen diameter-to-platelet ratio score (ASPS), the latter of which was calculated as ARFI velocity × spleen diameter/platelet count. The area under receiver operating characteristic curve (AUROC) of the varices risk score and ASPS to predict HEVs were 0.935 (95% confidence interval [CI] 0.882-0.970) and 0.946 (95% CI 0.895-0.977), respectively. When ASPS, a simpler model with a higher AUROC, was applied in the validation set, acceptable diagnostic accuracy for HEVs was observed (AUROC = 0.814 [95% CI 0.743-0.885]). To detect HEVs, a negative predictive value of 98.3% was achieved at ASPS <2.83, whereas a positive predictive value of 100% was achieved at ASPS >5.28.ASPS, a novel noninvasive ARFI-based prediction model, can accurately identify HEVs in patients with compensated cirrhosis. ASPS <2.83 may safely rule out the presence of HEVs, whereas patients with ASPS >5.28 should be considered for endoscopic examinations or appropriate prophylactic treatment.Prevalence and predictors of esophageal varices in patients with primary sclerosing cholangitis.Patients with primary sclerosing cholangitis (PSC) may develop and bleed from esophageal varices. However, the exact prevalence of esophageal varices in patients with PSC remains unknown and potential predictors of esophageal varices in this population have not been identified. Our aim was to determine the prevalence of esophageal varices in patients with PSC and the variables that predict their presence. Data were collected on 283 patients with PSC treated for the first time at the Mayo Clinic (Rochester, MN) during 8 consecutive years. Thirty-six percent (102 of 283) of patients had esophageal varices including 56% (57 of 102) with moderate/large varices. After excluding 28 patients with a history of variceal bleeding, data on 183 patients were analyzed to identify independent predictors of esophageal varices and of moderate/large size varices. Platelet count, albumin level, and advanced histologic disease were independent predictors of esophageal varices (area under the receiver operator characteristic [ROC] curve = 0.88). After controlling for the presence of advanced histologic stage and albumin levels, the odds ratios (OR) of platelet count less than 150 x 10(3)/dL for the presence of esophageal varices was 6.3 (95% CI: 2.6-15.8). The diagnostic accuracy of these results was corroborated by cross-validation of the data in an independent set of 72 patients with PSC (area under the ROC = 0.90). In conclusion, in patients with PSC, noninvasive markers of portal hypertension and of advanced liver disease predict the presence of esophageal varices. Our results suggest a clinically applicable and useful approach to identify patients with PSC who are more likely to benefit from endoscopic screening for esophageal varices.Platelet count/spleen diameter ratio: proposal and validation of a non-invasive parameter to predict the presence of oesophageal varices in patients with liver cirrhosis.Cirrhotic patients frequently undergo screening endoscopy for the presence of oesophageal varices (OV). In the future, this social and medical burden will increase due to the greater number of patients with chronic liver disease and their improved survival. In this study, our aims were (1) to identify clinical, biochemical, and ultrasonographic parameters which might non-invasively predict the presence of OV in patients with liver cirrhosis; (2) to evaluate the reproducibility of the obtained results in a different, although related, further group of patients; and (3) to assess the predictiveness of the identified rules in patients with compensated cirrhosis.In the first part of the study we retrospectively evaluated the presence of OV in 145 cirrhotic patients, and in the second part we evaluated the reproducibility of the study results in a subsequent group of 121 patients. Finally, we evaluated these parameters in a subgroup of 145 patients with compensated disease. All 266 patients underwent a complete biochemical workup, upper digestive endoscopy, and ultrasonographic measurement of spleen bipolar diameter. Platelet count/spleen diameter ratio was calculated for all patients.The prevalence rates of OV were 61% and 58% in the first and second groups of patients, respectively. In the first part of the study, we found that platelet count, spleen diameter, platelet count/spleen diameter ratio, and Child- Pugh class were significantly different among patients with or without OV, although the platelet count/spleen diameter ratio was the only parameter which was independently associated with the presence of OV in a multivariate analysis. A platelet count/spleen diameter ratio cut off value of 909 had 100% negative predictive value for a diagnosis of OV. This result was reproduced in the second group of patients as well as in patients with compensated disease. In a cost-benefit analysis, screening cirrhotic patients according to the "platelet count/spleen diameter ratio strategy" was far more cost effective compared with the "scope all strategy".The platelet count/spleen diameter ratio is the only parameter which is independently associated with the presence of OV, and its negative predictive value is reproducible. Its use is of value even in the subgroup of patients with compensated disease, and it is also cost effective.A clinical prediction rule and platelet count predict esophageal varices in children.The validation of noninvasive tests to diagnose esophageal varices is a priority in children because repeated endoscopic evaluations are too invasive. We measured the ability of a previously developed noninvasive clinical prediction rule (CPR) to predict the presence of esophageal varices in children.We analyzed data from 108 children, younger than age 18, who received endoscopies at 8 centers, to assess portal hypertension from chronic liver disease or portal vein obstruction. Blood test and abdominal ultrasound scan results were obtained within 4 months of endoscopy. Grading of varices identified by endoscopy was confirmed by independent blinded review. Spleen size, based on data from the ultrasound scan, was expressed as a standard deviation score relative to normal values for age.Of the children studied, 74 had esophageal varices (69%), including 35 with large varices (32%). The best noninvasive predictors of esophageal varices of any size were as follows: platelet:spleen size z-score ratio (area under the receiver operating characteristic curve [AUROC], 0.84; 95% confidence interval [CI] 0.75-0.93), CPR (AUROC, 0.80; 95% CI, 0.70-0.91), and platelet count (AUROC, 0.79; 95% CI, 0.69-0.90). The positive predictive values for the CPR and platelet count were 0.87 and 0.86, the negative predictive values were 0.64 and 0.63, the positive likelihood ratios were 3.06 and 2.76, and the negative likelihood ratios were 0.64 and 0.63, respectively. Based on positive and negative predictive values, the most accurate noninvasive tests were the CPR and platelet counts.Noninvasive tests such as CPR and platelet count can assist in triaging children for endoscopy to identify esophageal varices.Measurement of spleen stiffness to evaluate portal hypertension and the presence of esophageal varices in patients with HCV-related cirrhosis.The hepatic vein pressure gradient (HVPG) is the standard used to determine the degree of portal hypertension (PH) and an important prognostic factor for patients with cirrhosis; HVPG values correlate with the presence of esophageal varices (EV). However, HVPG can only be accurately determined at specialized centers; noninvasive methods are needed to predict HVPG values and the presence of EV. We compared the diagnostic performance of spleen stiffness (SS) measurement by transient elastography with that of liver stiffness (LS) and of other recently proposed noninvasive tests.We measured SS and LS in 100 consecutive patients with hepatitis C virus-induced cirrhosis. Patients were also assessed by FibroScan, HVPG, esophagogastroduodenoscopy, and liver biopsy. We also analyzed LS-spleen diameter to platelet ratio score and platelet count to spleen diameter.SS and LS were more accurate than other noninvasive parameters in identifying patients with EV and different degrees of PH. A linear model that included SS and LS accurately predicted HVPG values (R(2) = 0.85). The results were internally validated using bootstrap analysis.Measurement of SS can be used for noninvasive assessment and monitoring of PH and to detect EV in patients with hepatitis C virus-induced cirrhosis.Platelet count/spleen diameter ratio for the noninvasive diagnosis of esophageal varices: results of a multicenter, prospective, validation study.Noninvasive assessment of esophageal varices (EV) may improve the management of patients with cirrhosis and decrease both the medical and financial burden related to screening. In this multicenter, international study, our aim was to prospectively validate the use of the platelet count/spleen diameter ratio for the noninvasive diagnosis of EV.A total of 218 cirrhotic patients underwent screening endoscopy for EV. Platelet count/spleen diameter ratio ((N/mm3)/mm) was assessed in all patients and its diagnostic accuracy was calculated. On the basis of previous results, a platelet count/spleen diameter ratio cutoff of 909 was applied to this population. The diagnostic accuracy of the platelet count/spleen diameter ratio was further evaluated for both severity and etiology of disease subgroups.Prevalence of EV was 54.1%. The platelet count/spleen diameter ratio had 86.0% (95% CI, 80.7-90.4%) diagnostic accuracy for EV, which was significantly greater as compared with either accuracy of platelet count alone (83.6%, 95% CI 78.0-88.3%, P= 0.038) or spleen diameter alone (80.2%, 95% CI 74.3-85.3%, P= 0.018). The 909 cutoff had 91.5% sensitivity (95% CI 85.0-95.9%), 67.0% specificity (95% CI 56.9-76.1%), 76.6% positive predictive value, 87.0% negative predictive value, 2.77 positive likelihood ratio, and 0.13 negative likelihood ratio for the diagnosis of EV. Accuracy of the platelet count/spleen diameter ratio was maintained for both severity and etiology of disease subgroups.The platelet count/spleen diameter ratio may be proposed as a safe and reproducible means to improve the management of cirrhotic patients who should undergo screening endoscopy for EV.The prevalence and risk factors associated with esophageal varices in subjects with hepatitis C and advanced fibrosis.The factors predictive of the presence or the absence of esophageal varices in hepatitis C virus (HCV) and advanced fibrosis have not been defined.To define the prevalence of esophageal varices and the factors that are positively and negatively with such varices in hepatitis C and advanced fibrosis.A prospective study of esophageal varices and associated risk factors in subjects with hepatitis C and advanced fibrosis.Prerandomization data from the HALT-C (hepatitis C long-term antiviral treatment against cirrhosis) clinical trial.Subjects with bridging fibrosis or cirrhosis, who were virologic nonresponders to treatment with pegylated interferon alpha 2a and ribavirin, underwent endoscopy.Sixteen percent of subjects with bridging fibrosis (95/598) and 39% of subjects with cirrhosis (164/418) had varices (P < .0001); 2% of subjects with bridging fibrosis (13/598) and 11% of those with cirrhosis (48/418) had medium or large varices. Subjects with bridging fibrosis and varices had a significantly lower platelet count and higher bilirubin and international normalized ratio (INR) compared with those without varices, suggesting that the biopsy may have underestimated the severity of fibrosis. A platelet count >150,000/mm(3) was associated with a negative predictive value of 99% for esophageal varices. By logistic regression modeling, African American race and female sex were protective, whereas a lower platelet count and higher bilirubin and INR predicted varices (c statistic, 0.758).The risk of having varices increases with decreasing platelet counts, increasing bilirubin, and INR. The probability of having medium or large varices at platelet counts >150,000/mm(3) is negligible in this population.Utilization of platelet count spleen diameter ratio in predicting the presence of esophageal varices in patients with cirrhosis.To assess whether the platelet count/spleen diameter ratio is a useful noninvasive predictor of esophageal varices.Current guidelines recommend that all patients with cirrhosis undergo screening endoscopy for the presence of varices. Recent studies have focused on using noninvasive techniques to stratify cirrhotic patients according to their risk of having varices. One study examining the platelet count/spleen diameter ratio using a cut-off value of 909, yielded a negative predictive value of 100% for the presence of varices.A retrospective analysis of 137 patients with cirrhosis over the age of 18 that underwent screening endoscopy for varices between January 2003 and October 2005. The data collected were age, sex, etiology of cirrhosis, spleen diameter, prothrombin time/international normalized ratio, total bilirubin, platelet count, albumin, Child-Pugh score, and endoscopic findings.There were 137 patients with 87 (63.5%) men and a mean age of 56 years. Seventy-six (55%) patients had esophageal varices. The mean age, sex, and etiology of cirrhosis were similar between those with and without varices. Using a platelet count/spleen diameter ratio with a cut-off value of 909, yielded a negative predictive value of only 73% and a positive predictive value of 74%.The platelet count/spleen diameter ratio with a cut-off value of 909 may not be sufficiently accurate in predicting the presence of esophageal varices. Upper endoscopy remains the method of choice to screen for the presence of varices.Platelet count/spleen diameter ratio for non-invasive prediction of high risk esophageal varices in cirrhotic patients.Prophylaxis therapy is indicated in cirrhotic patients with large esophageal varices or small varices with red wale signs (high risk esophageal varices; HREV). Endoscopic surveillance to detect HREV is currently recommended. The objective of this study is to identify non-invasive predictors of HREV in cirrhotic patients.Adult cirrhotic patients without previous variceal bleeding were prospectively included. All patients underwent a complete biochemical workup, upper digestive endoscopy, and ultrasonographic measurement of spleen bipolar diameter. Platelet count/spleen diameter ratio (PC/SD) was calculated for all patients. The association of these variables with the presence of HREV in upper endoscopy was tested using univariate and multivariate analysis. Receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curves were constructed for variables associated with HREV.Sixty-seven patients were included. The prevalence rate of HREV was 50%. Age, gender (female), platelet count, spleen diameter, PC/SD ratio, total bilirrubin, prothrombin activity (INR), Child-Pugh score, clinical and ultrasonographic ascites were significantly associated with presence of HREV in univariate analysis. Age and PC/SD ratio were the parameters independently associated with HREV in a multivariate analysis, with OR 8.81 (CI 95%: 1.7-44.9) and OR 11.21 (CI 95%: 2.8-44.6) respectively. A PC/SD ratio cut-off value under 830.8 predicted HREV with 76.9% sensitivity, 74.2% specificity and 77.8% negative predictive value (ROC curve area: 0.78).The PC/SD ratio was significantly associated with HREV, but with suboptimal sensitivity and specificity. Therefore, the results of this study do not support the routine clinical use of PC/SD ratio for screening of HREV.Platelet count/spleen diameter ratio: analysis of its capacity as a predictor of the existence of esophageal varices.Upper gastrointestinal bleeding associated to esophageal varices is the most dramatic complication of cirrhosis. It is recommended screening every cirrhotic for esophageal varices with endoscopy.To evaluate the capacity of the platelet count/spleen diameter ratio in non-invasively predicting esophageal varices in a population of cirrhotics originated in an independent center from the one in which it was developed.The study included patients from the ambulatory care clinic of cirrhosis of a Brazilian hospital and studied platelet count, spleen diameter and presence of esophageal varices, as well as Child and MELD scores. It used a cutoff value of 909 for the platelet count/spleen diameter ratio, as previously published. A sample of 139 patients was needed to grant results a 95% confidence level.The study included 164 cirrhotics, 56.7% male, with a mean age of 56.6 ± 11.6 years. In the univariate analysis, platelet count, spleen diameter, presence of ascites, Child and MELD scores and the platelet count/spleen diameter ratio were related to esophageal varices (P<0.05). The platelet count/spleen diameter ratio had sensitivity of 77.5% (95% CI = 0.700-0.850), specificity of 45.5% (95% CI = 0.307-0.602), positive predictive value of 79.5% (95% CI = 0.722-0.868), negative predictive value of 42.6% (95% CI = 0.284-0.567) and accuracy of 68.9% (95% CI = 0.618-0.760). In the multivariate analysis, platelet count was the only variable which related to esophageal varices (P<0.05).Platelet count/ spleen diameter ratio is not adequate to predict esophageal varices in cirrhotics.Spleen stiffness in patients with cirrhosis in predicting esophageal varices.Screening for esophageal varices (EV) is recommended in patients with cirrhosis. Noninvasive tests had shown varying sensitivity (Se) and specificity (Sp) for predicting EV. Splenomegaly is a common finding in liver cirrhosis because of portal and splenic congestion. These changes can be quantified by transient elastography; hence, the aim of this study was to investigate the utility of spleen stiffness (SS) in evaluating EV in comparison with other noninvasive tests.We measured SS and liver stiffness (LS) by using FibroScan in 200 consecutive cirrhotic patients who met the inclusion criteria. Patients were also assessed by hepatic venous pressure gradient (HVPG), upper gastrointestinal endoscopy, LS-spleen diameter to platelet ratio score (LSPS), and platelet count to spleen diameter ratio (PSR).Of 200 patients enrolled, 174 patients had valid LS and SS measurement, and 124 (71%) patients had EV (small, n=46 and large n=78). There was a significant difference in median LS (51.4 vs. 23.9 kPa, P=0.001), SS (54 vs. 32 kPa, P=0.001), LSPS (6.1 vs. 2.5, P=0.001), and PSR (812 vs. 1,165, P=0.001) between patients with EV and those without EV. LS ≥27.3 kPa had an Se of 91%, Sp of 72%, positive predictive value (PPV) of 89%, negative predictive value (NPV) of 76%, and a diagnostic accuracy of 86% in predicting EV. LSPS ≥3.09 had Se and Sp of 89% and 76%, respectively, and a PSR cutoff value of 909 or less had Se of 64%, Sp of 76%, and diagnostic accuracy of 68% in predicting EV. SS ≥40.8 kPa had Se (94%), Sp (76%), PPV (91%), NPV (84%), and diagnostic accuracy of 86% for predicting EV. SS was significantly higher in patients who had large varices (56 vs. 49 kPa, P=0.001) and variceal bleed (58 vs. 50.2 kPa, P=0.001). Combining LS+SS (27.3+40.8 kPa) had Se of 90%, Sp 90%, PPV 96%, NPV 79%, and a diagnostic accuracy of 90%. HVPG (n=52) showed significant correlation with SS (r=0.433, P=0.001), LSPS (r=0.335, P=0.01), and PSR (r=-0.270, P=0.05), but not with LS (r=0.178, P=0.20).Measurement of SS can be used for noninvasive assessment of EV and can differentiate large vs. small varices and nonbleeder vs. bleeder.Noninvasive methods for prediction of esophageal varices in pediatric patients with portal hypertension.To evaluate clinical and laboratory parameters for prediction of bleeding from esophageal varices (EV) in children with portal hypertension.Retrospective study of 103 children (mean age: 10.1 ± 7.7 years), 95.1% with intrahepatic portal hypertension. All patients had no history of bleeding and underwent esophagogastroduodenoscopy for EV screening. We recorded variceal size (F1, F2 and F3), red-color signs and portal gastropathy, according to the Japanese Research Society for Portal Hypertension classification. Patients were classified into two groups: with and without EV. Seven noninvasive markers were evaluated as potential predictors of EV: (1) platelet count; (2) spleen size z score, expressed as a standard deviation score relative to normal values for age; (3) platelet count to spleen size z score ratio; (4) platelets count to spleen size (cm) ratio; (5) the clinical prediction rule (CPR); (6) the aspartate aminotransferase to platelet ratio index (APRI); and (7) the risk score.Seventy-one children had EV on first endoscopy. On univariate analysis, spleen size, platelets, CPR, risk score, APRI, and platelet count to spleen size z score ratio showed significant associations. The best noninvasive predictors of EV were platelet count [area under the receiver operating characteristic curve (AUROC) 0.82; 95%CI: 0.73-0.91], platelet: spleen size z score (AUROC 0.78; 95%CI: 0.67-0.88), CPR (AUROC 0.77; 95%CI: 0.64-0.89), and risk score (AUROC 0.77; 95%CI: 0.66-0.88). A logistic regression model was applied with EV as the dependent variable and corrected by albumin, bilirubin and spleen size z score. Children with a CPR < 114 were 20.7-fold more likely to have EV compared to children with CPR > 114. A risk score > -1.2 increased the likelihood of EV (odds ratio 7.47; 95%CI: 2.06-26.99).Children with portal hypertension with a CPR below 114 and a risk score greater than -1.2 are more likely to have present EV. Therefore, these two tests can be helpful in selecting children for endoscopy.[LOW SPECIFICITY OF PLATELET TO SPLEEN RATIO FOR NONINVASIVE PREDIC- TION AND CHARACTERIZATION OF ESOPHAGEAL VARICES IN PATIENTS WITH ALCOHOLIC LIVER CIRRHOSIS].Diagnosis of esophageal varices (EV) is based upon endoscopic examination, which is a rather unpleasant method that carries a certain risk of complications. For that reason, efforts have been made to develop noninvasive methods for characterization of EV. The aim of this study was to explore the value of platelet count to spleen size ratio (PSR) for noninvasive prediction and characterization of EV in patients with alcoholic liver cirrhosis (ALC). One hundred and seventeen patients (20 females and 97 males, mean age 60.7) with ALC were included in our research. All patients underwent endoscopic examination upon which the EV were classified as small (< 5 mm), large (> 5 mm), or absent. Spleen size (bipolar diameter in mm) was assessed by ultrasound. Platelet count to spleen diameter ratio was calculated and the values obtained were compared to the presence, size and risk of bleeding from EV as defined by endoscopy. No significant difference in PSR could be found between patients without and with EV (1.341 ± 0.725 vs. 1.053 ± 0.636, respectively; p = 0.06). The PSR was significantly different between the patients with small and large EV (1.103 ± 0.689 vs. 0.876 ± 0.314; p < 0.05) with a cut-off value of 1.141 (sensitivity 94.7%, specificity 38.2%, AUROC = 0.656; p = 0.042). The value of PSR below 1.182 pointed to patients at risk from variceal bleeding with 91.7% sensitivity and 38.5% specificity (AUROC = 0.625, p = 0.035). Based on our results, it is not possible to recommend the use of PSR as the exclusive noninvasive indicator for the presence, size and bleeding risk from EV due to its low specificity for these categories in patients with ALC.Prediction of esophageal varices in patients with cirrhosis.To identify predictors of esophageal varices (EV) using available clinical, laboratory, and diagnostic imaging variables.Patients with cirrhosis frequently undergo screening endoscopy for varices so that prophylactic therapy and/or follow up can be planned. It is unclear how often patients should be screened endoscopically for varices, and there are few data on the relationship of varices to nonendoscopic variables.Charts were reviewed for 247 consecutive patients with cirrhosis who underwent screening esophagogastroduodenoscopy for varices.A total of 184 patients (68 women) were studied. Ninety-four patients (51%) had varices; of whom, 90 had only EV (small, n = 66; large, n = 24), 13 had EV and gastric varices, and 4 had isolated gastric varices. The distribution of EV according to the Child-Turcotte-Pugh class was as follows: A, 35%; B, 60%; and C, 69%, with roughly equal prevalence of large varices (29%, 24%, and 24%, respectively) in each class. Independent predictors of large varices were thrombocytopenia ( p = 0.02) and splenomegaly ( p = 0.04) seen using imaging. A platelet count of less than 68,000/mm 3 had the highest discriminative value for large EV with a sensitivity of 71% and a specificity of 73%. Splenomegaly had sensitivity and specificity of 75% and 58%, respectively. Using these two variables, we placed patients into one of four groups, with a risk for large varices ranging from 4% to 34%.The prevalence of EV in cirrhosis increases with the severity of liver disease, as expected. Thrombocytopenia and splenomegaly are independent predictors of large EV in cirrhosis. Further prospective studies might result in a discriminating algorithm to predict which patients with cirrhosis would benefit from early or regular endoscopy to detect clinically significant varices.Predictors of large esophageal varices in patients with cirrhosis.Recent guidelines recommend that all cirrhotics undergo screening upper endoscopy to identify those patients at risk for bleeding from varices. However, this practice may not be cost effective as large esophageal varices are seen only in 9-36% of these patients. The aim of this study was to determine whether clinical variables were predictive of the presence of large esophageal varices.This is a retrospective analysis of cirrhotics who had a screening upper endoscopy during an evaluation for liver transplantation at three different centers and who had not previously bled from varices. A multivariate model was derived on the combined cohort using logistic regression. Three hundred forty-six patients were eligible for the study.The prevalence of large esophageal varices was 20%. On multivariate analysis, splenomegaly detected by computed tomographic scan (odds ratio: 4.3; 95% confidence interval: 1.6-11.5) or by physical examination (odds ratio: 2.0; 95% confidence interval: 1.1-3.8), and low platelet count were independent predictors of large esophageal varices. On the basis of these variables, cirrhotics were stratified into high- and low-risk groups for the presence of large esophageal varices. Patients with a platelet count of > or = 88,000/mm3 (median value) and no splenomegaly by physical examination had a risk of large esophageal varices of 7.2%. Those with splenomegaly or platelet count < 88,000/mm3 had a risk of large esophageal varices of 28% (p < 0.0001).Our data show that clinical predictors could be used to stratify cirrhotic patients for the risk of large esophageal varices and such stratification could be used to improve the cost effectiveness of screening endoscopy.Application of the platelet count/spleen diameter ratio to rule out the presence of oesophageal varices in patients with cirrhosis: a validation study based on follow-up.Screening for oesophageal varices represents an important part of the diagnostic work-up of cirrhotic patients. We have previously shown that the platelet count/spleen diameter ratio is a parameter that can rule out the presence of oesophageal varices safely and in a cost-effective fashion.To evaluate the prognostic and diagnostic accuracy of the platelet count/spleen diameter ratio for ruling out the presence of oesophageal varices in the follow-up of a cohort of cirrhotic patients without oesophageal varices at inclusion.After initial endoscopy, the 106 cirrhotic patients without oesophageal varices who participated in our previous study were followed-up with annual or biannual surveillance endoscopy. Patients were censored at the time of diagnosis of oesophageal varices or at their last visit, and at that time platelet count and spleen diameter were recorded. Sixty-eight patients made up the study cohort after excluding patients who were lost to follow-up or died before undergoing control endoscopy.During the follow-up, 27 patients (40%) developed oesophageal varices. Patients with higher baseline platelet count/spleen diameter ratios (p<0.0001) as well as a ratio above 909 were less likely to develop oesophageal varices (p<0.0005). At follow-up, a platelet count/spleen diameter ratio < or = 909 had 100% negative predictive value and 84% efficiency in identifying the presence of oesophageal varices.The use of the platelet count/spleen diameter ratio proved to be an effective means for ruling out the presence of oesophageal varices even in the longitudinal follow-up of patients.Measurement of spleen stiffness by acoustic radiation force impulse imaging identifies cirrhotic patients with esophageal varices.We evaluated whether spleen stiffness (SS), measured by acoustic radiation force impulse imaging, can identify patients who have esophageal varices (EVs); those without EVs would not require endoscopic examination.In a prospective study, we measured SS and liver stiffness (LS) in 340 patients with cirrhosis undergoing endoscopic screening for EVs and 16 healthy volunteers (controls) at the Kurashiki Central Hospital in Okayama, Japan. The diagnostic accuracy of SS for the presence of EVs was compared with that of other noninvasive parameters (LS, spleen diameter, and platelet count). Optimal cutoff values of SS were chosen to confidently rule out the presence of varices.Patients with cirrhosis had significantly higher SS and LS values than controls (P < .0001 and P < .0001, respectively). Levels of SS were higher among patients with EVs (n = 132) than controls, and values were highest among patients with high-risk EVs (n = 87). SS had the greatest diagnostic accuracy for the identification of patients with EVs or high-risk EVs compared with other noninvasive parameters, independent of the etiology of cirrhosis. An SS cutoff value of 3.18 m/s identified patients with EVs with a 98.4% negative predictive value, 98.5% sensitivity, 75.0% accuracy, and 0.025 negative likelihood ratio. An SS cutoff value of 3.30 m/s identified patients with high-risk EVs with a 99.4% negative predictive value, 98.9% sensitivity, 72.1% accuracy, and 0.018 negative likelihood ratio. SS values less than 3.3 m/s ruled out the presence of high-risk varices in patients with compensated or decompensated cirrhosis. SS could not be measured in 16 patients (4.5%).Measurements of SS can be used to identify patients with cirrhosis with EVs or high-risk EVs. A cutoff SS was identified that could rule out the presence of varices and could be used as an initial noninvasive screening test; UMIN Clinical Trials Registry number, UMIN000004363.Platelet count/spleen diameter ratio to predict esophageal varices in Mexican patients with hepatic cirrhosis.To validate whether the platelet count/spleen size ratio can be used to predict the presence of esophageal varices in Mexican patients with hepatic cirrhosis.This was an analytical cross-sectional study to validate the diagnostic test for hepatic cirrhosis and was performed between February 2010 and December 2011. Patients with a diagnosis of hepatic cirrhosis were included and stratified using their Child-Pugh score. Biochemical parameters were evaluated, and ultrasound was used to measure the longest diameter of the spleen. The platelet count/spleen diameter ratio was calculated and analyzed to determine whether it can predict the presence of esophageal varices. Upper gastrointestinal endoscopy was used as the gold standard. Sensitivity and specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and positive and negative likelihood ratios were determined, with the cutoff points determined by receiver-operating characteristic curves.A total of 91 patients were included. The mean age was 53.75 ± 12 years; 50 (54.9%) were men, and 41 (45.0%) women. The etiology of cirrhosis included alcohol in 48 (52.7%), virally induced in 24 (26.3%), alcoholism plus hepatitis C virus in three (3.2%), cryptogenic in nine (9.8%), and primary biliary cirrhosis in seven (7.6%). Esophageal varices were present in 73 (80.2%) patients. Child-Pugh classification, 17 (18.6%) patients were classified as class A, 37 (40.6%) as class B, and 37 (40.6%) as class C. The platelet count/spleen diameter ratio to detect esophageal varices independent of the grade showed using a cutoff value of ≤ 884.3, had 84% sensitivity, 70% specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of 94% and 40%, respectively.Our results suggest that the platelet count/spleen diameter ratio may be a useful tool for detecting esophageal varices in patients with hepatic cirrhosis.[The value of Doppler-ultrasonography and laboratory tests as non-invasive predictors of the presence of esophageal varices in patients with chronic liver disease].Upper gastrointestinal endoscopy is usually recommended for the evaluation of esophageal varices in patients with liver cirrhosis. However, the prevalence of varices is extremely variable. We performed this study to determine the predictive values for esophageal varices and to select eligible patients for screening endoscopy.Fifty-two patients were enrolled in this study. Laboratory tests including liver biochemistry and complete blood count along with ultrasonography with Doppler measurements and endoscopy were performed.Esophageal varices were present in 25 patients (48%). Variables associated with the presence of esophageal varices on univariate analysis were serum albumin, total bilirubin, prothrombin time and platelet count (p<0.05). Significant variables in ultrasonography with Doppler measurement were diameter of spleen (13.04+/-2.1 cm vs. 10.39+/-1.6 cm, p<0.001), peak velocity of portal vein (30.2+/-7.5 cm/sec vs. 36.1+/-8.0 cm/sec, p<0.01) and portal vein diameter (1.26+/-0.28 cm vs. 1.13+/-0.18 cm, p<0.05). On multivariate analysis, independent variables were platelet count (odds ratio (OR) 0.922; 95% confidence interval (CI), 0.86-0.99), diameter of spleen (OR 5.4; 95% CI, 1.63-17.88) and platelet count/spleen diameter ratio (OR 1.007; 95% CI, 1.01-1.02). The optimal critical value for the diameter of spleen was 11 cm. The sensitivity and specificity with this value were 84% and 63%, respectively.Doppler measurement was not helpful in distinguishing the presence of varices. However, clinical tests including biochemistry and ultrasonography would be useful in selecting eligible patients for screening endoscopy. Endoscopic screening for esophageal varices is recommended in cirrhotic patients with splenomegaly.Prediction of large esophageal varices in patients with cirrhosis of the liver using clinical, laboratory and imaging parameters.It is currently recommended that all patients with liver cirrhosis undergo upper gastrointestinal endoscopy (UGIE) to identify those who have large esophageal varices (LEVx) that carry a high risk of bleeding and may benefit from prophylactic measures. This approach leads to unnecessary UGIE in those without LEVx. We tried to identify clinical, laboratory and imaging parameters that may predict the presence of LEVx and help select patients for UGIE.This prospective study included newly diagnosed patients with cirrhosis and no history of gastrointestinal bleeding scheduled to undergo UGIE. Patients underwent detailed clinical examination, blood tests (hematology, liver function tests) and ultrasonography. Size of esophageal varices was assessed at UGIE; Paquet's grades 0-II were classified as small varices, and III-IV as LEVx. Association of LEVx with qualitative and quantitative parameters was studied using chi(2) and Mann-Whitney U-tests, respectively. Parameters found to be significant were tested in a forward-conditional multivariate logistic regression analysis to identify independent predictors. Receiver operating characteristic curve analysis was used to assess the efficacy of prediction models.Of the 101 patients (median age 45; range 15-74 years; 87 male; Child-Pugh class: A 18, B 31, C 52), 46 had LEVx. On univariate analysis, five variables were significantly associated with the presence of LEVx. These included pallor (P = 0.026), palpable spleen (P = 0.009), platelet count (P < 0.002), total leukocyte count (P < 0.0004) and liver span on ultrasound (P = 0.031). On multivariate analysis, two of these parameters, namely low platelet count and presence of palpable spleen, were found to be independent predictors of the presence of LEVx. A receiver-operating characteristics curve using the predictor function arrived at from this analysis had an area under the curve of 0.760.Presence of palpable spleen and low platelet count are independent predictors of presence of LEVx in patients with cirrhosis. Use of these parameters may help identify patients with a low probability of LEVx who may not need UGIE. This may help reduce costs and discomfort for these patients and the burden on endoscopy units.Clinical and laboratory predictors of esophageal varices in children and adolescents with portal hypertension syndrome.To determine the clinical and laboratory parameters that may predict the presence of esophageal varices in children and adolescents with portal hypertension.Overall, 111 patients with portal hypertension and no previous history of digestive bleeding underwent esophagogastroduodenoscopy for detection of esophageal varices. A univariate analysis initially was carried out, followed by a logistic regression analysis to identify the independent variables associated with the presence of esophageal varices. Sensitivity and specificity rates, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and the accuracy of the predictive variables identified among cirrhotic patients were calculated with the esophagogastroduodenoscopy as the reference test.Sixty percent of patients had esophageal varices on the first esophagogastroduodenoscopy. Patients with portal vein thrombosis and congenital hepatic fibrosis were 6.15-fold more likely to have esophageal varices than cirrhotic patients. When we analyzed 85 cirrhotic patients alone, splenomegaly and hypoalbuminemia remained significant indicators of esophageal varices. Only spleen enlargement showed appropriate sensitivity and negative predictive value (97.7% and 91.7%, respectively) to be used as a screening test for esophageal varices among cirrhotic patients.In reference services and research protocols, endoscopic screening should be performed in all patients with portal vein thrombosis and congenital hepatic fibrosis. Among cirrhotic patients, the indication should be conditioned to clinical evidence of splenomegaly or hypoalbuminemia. For clinicians, the recommendation is to emphasize the orientations given to guardians of patients with portal vein thrombosis and congenital hepatic fibrosis as to the risk of digestive bleeding. Cirrhotic patients with hypoalbuminemia and splenomegaly should receive the same orientations.Early detection in routine clinical practice of cirrhosis and oesophageal varices in chronic hepatitis C: comparison of transient elastography (FibroScan) with standard laboratory tests and non-invasive scores.To assess prospectively the accuracy of transient elastography (TE, FibroScan) for the detection of cirrhosis and oesophageal varices (OV) in chronic hepatitis C (CHC), as compared with currently available non-invasive methods (AST/ALT ratio (AAR), APRI, prothrombin index (PI), platelet count (PC), FibroTest (FT) and Lok index).All tests were performed the day of liver biopsy (LB), taken as reference, in 298 consecutive CHC patients (cirrhosis: 70; Child-Pugh A: 70; OV: 25).TE had the best diagnostic accuracy for detection of cirrhosis (AUROCs: TE 0.96 vs. FT 0.82, Lok and APRI 0.80, PC 0.79, PI 0.73, AAR 0.61, respectively; p < 0.0001). Overall, the percentage of saved LB was: TE (cut-off: 12.5 kPa) 90%, PC 82%, FT 79%, PI 77%, AAR 76%, APRI 70%, and Lok 45%, respectively. At a cut-off of 21.5 kPa, TE predicted the presence of OV with 76% sensitivity and 78% specificity and correctly classified 73% of patients vs. AAR 81%, Lok 77%, FT, PI 70%, PC 69%, and APRI 66%, respectively.TE is currently the most accurate non-invasive method for early detection of cirrhosis in CHC (cut-off: 12.5 kPa), as compared with other available methods, but cannot replace endoscopy for OV screening.PLATELET COUNT TO SPLEEN DIAMETER RATIO AND TO SPLEEN AREA RATIO AS PREDICTORS FOR ESOPHA-GEAL VARICES IN CHRONIC HEPATITIS C PATIENTS WITH LIVER CIRRHOSIS.Endoscopic detection of esophageal varices (EV) especially the high risk esophageal varices (HREV) is recommended in cirrhotic patients. There are several studies about non-invasive markers to predict the presence of EV. The aim of this study was to evaluate platelet count to spleen diameter (P/D) ratio and platelet count to spleen area (P/A) ratio as predictors for EV and HREV in patients with liver cirrhosis. This prospective study included 100 cirrhotic patients without previous variceal hemorrhage or endoscopic intervesion. Biochemical, imaging and endoscopic findings were collected in all patients. Several parameters including P/D and P/A ratio were measured and their association with the presence of EV and HREV was tested. The results showed that only P/D and P/A ratios were found to be independent predictors for the presence of EV and HREV in multivariant analysis. For prediction of the EV formation in cirrhotic patients, P/D ratio at value < or =979.9 and P/A ratio of < or =20.6 had area under the curve (AUC) 0.922 and 0.975 respectively with sensitivity 100%, specificity 30% for P/D ratio and sensitivity 100%, specificity 75% for P/A ratio. For prediction of the HREV formation, P/D ratio at value < or = 587.9 and P/A ratio of 513.7 had AUC 0.867 and 0.991 respectively with sensitivity 100%, specificity 50% for P/D ratio and sensitivity 100%, specificity 88% for P/A ratio.Platelet count/spleen diameter ratio as a predictor of oesophageal varices in alcoholic cirrhosis.Insulin resistance is a risk factor for esophageal varices in hepatitis C virus cirrhosis.Indirect methods to predict the presence of esophageal varices (EV) in patients with cirrhosis are not sensitive enough to be used as a surrogate for endoscopy. We tested the effectiveness of liver stiffness measurement (LSM) by transient elastography and the presence of insulin resistance (IR), a marker associated with fibrosis progression, in the noninvasive prediction of portal hypertension. One hundred four consecutive patients with newly diagnosed Child A hepatitis C virus (HCV) cirrhosis underwent upper gastrointestinal endoscopy to search for EV. Clinical, anthropometric, biochemical, ultrasonographic, and metabolic features, including IR by the homeostasis model assessment (HOMA), and LSM by transient elastography, were recorded at the time of endoscopy. EVs were detected in 63 of 104 patients (60%). In 10 patients (16%), the EVs were medium-large (>or=F2). By multivariate analysis, the presence of EVs was independently associated with a low platelet count/spleen diameter ratio (OR, 0.998; 95% CI, 0.996-0.999) and a high HOMA-IR score (OR, 1.296; 95%CI, 1.018-1.649), not with LSM (OR, 1.009; 95%CI, 0.951-1.070). It is noteworthy that nine of ten patients with medium-large EVs had a platelet/spleen ratio of less than 792 or an HOMA-IR of greater than 3.5. The independent association between low platelet count/spleen diameter ratio (OR, 0.998; 95%CI, 0.996-1.000), high HOMA-IR score (OR, 1.373; 95%CI, 1.014-1.859) and presence of EV was confirmed in the subgroup of 77 nondiabetic subjects.In patients with Child A HCV cirrhosis, two simple, easy-to-get tests, namely the platelet/spleen ratio and insulin resistance measured by HOMA-IR, regardless of the presence of diabetes, significantly predict the presence of EV, outweighing the contribution given by transient elastography.Validation of a multivariate model predicting presence and size of varices.A model developed by our group identified low platelets and advanced Child-Pugh class (CPC) as being associated with large varices.To validate a defined cut-off of platelets < or =80,000/microL in CPC-A for large varices and platelets < or =90,000/microL in CPC-B/C for any varices.Validation cohorts consisted of patients with cirrhosis undergoing screening for varices from Oregon Health and Science University (n=152), Indiana University (n=252), and Genoa, Italy (n=101). Similar clinical and laboratory data were collected as for the original cohort. To assess the ability of these cut-offs to predict presence of large and any varices, sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, likelihood ratios, and the c-statistic were measured.The validation cohorts were statistically different from the original cohort with regards to CPC and prevalence of large varices. Combining the original (n=301) and validation cohorts resulted in a negative predictive value of 92.1% for platelets < or =80,000/microL in CPC-A for large varices and positive predictive value of 80.1% for platelets < or =90,000/microL in CPC-B/C for any varices. Combining the 4 cohorts yielded a c-statistic of 0.67 (95% confidence interval: 063-0.72). No other factors such as splenomegaly and Model for End-Stage Liver Disease score were identified as significant.This study confirms the validity of a previous model identifying low platelets and advanced CPC class as predictors of large varices. Despite combining the cohorts, no other risk factors were identified.Non-invasive predictors of esophageal varices.Current guidelines recommend screening cirrhotic patients with an endoscopy to detect esophageal varices and to institute prophylactic measures in patients with large esophageal varices. In this study, we aimed at identifying non-endoscopic parameters that could predict the presence and grades of esophageal varices.In a prospective study, 229 newly diagnosed patients with liver cirrhosis, without a history of variceal bleeding, were included. Demographic, clinical, biochemical and ultrasonographic parameters were recorded. Esophageal varices were classified as small and large, at endoscopy. Univariate analysis and multivariate logistic regression analysis were done to identify independent predictors for the presence and grades of varices.Of the 229 patients (141 males; median age 42 years; range 17-73 years) with liver cirrhosis, 97 (42.3%) had small and 81 (35.4%) had large varices. On multivariate analysis, low platelet count (Odd's Ratio [OR], 4.3; 95% confidence interval [CI], 1.2-14.9), Child Pugh class B/C (OR, 3.3; 95% CI, 1.8-6.3), spleen diameter (OR, 4.3; 95% CI, 1.6-11.9) and portal vein diameter (OR, 2.4; 95% CI, 1.1-5.3) were independent predictors for the presence of varices. Likewise, for the presence of large esophageal varices, low platelet count (OR, 2.7; 95% CI, 1.4-5.2), Child Pugh class B/C (OR, 3.8; 95% CI, 2.3-6.5) and spleen diameter (OR, 3.1; 95% CI, 1.6-6.0) were the independent risk factors.The presence and higher grades of varices can be predicted by a low platelet count, Child-Pugh class B/C and spleen diameter. These may be considered as non-endoscopic predictors for the diagnosis and management of large grade varices.Gamna-Gandy bodies of the spleen detected with susceptibility weighted imaging: maybe a new potential non-invasive marker of esophageal varices.Portal hypertension (PH) is a clinical sequelae of liver cirrhosis, and bleeding from esophageal varices (EV) is a serious complication of PH with significant morbidity and mortality. The aims of this study were to assess the ability of 2D multislice breath-hold susceptibility weighted imaging (SWI) to detect Gamna-Gandy bodies (GGBs) in the spleens of patients with PH and to evaluate the potential role of GGB number as a non-invasive marker of PH and EV.T1-, T2- and T2(*)-weighted imaging and SWI were performed on 135 patients with PH and on 37 control individuals. Platelet counts were collected from all PH patients. Two radiologists analyzed all magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) data, and measured the portal vein diameter, splenic index (SI), and platelet count/spleen diameter ratio. The numbers of patients with GGBs in the spleen were determined, and the numbers of GGB were counted in the four MRI sequences in GGB-positive patients. The portal vein diameter, SI, platelet count, and platelet count/spleen diameter ratio of control individuals were compared with those of GGB-negative and GGB-positive patients on SWI images. The correlations among GGB numbers, the portal vein diameter, the SI, the platelet count, and the platelet count/spleen diameter ratio were analyzed.The GGB detection rate and the detected GGB number by using SWI were significantly greater than those by using T1-, T2-, and T2*-weighted images. The number of GGBs in the SWI images correlated positively with the portal vein diameter and SI and correlated negatively with the platelet count and platelet count/spleen diameter ratio.SWI provided more accurate information of GGBs in patients with PH. The number of GGB may be a non-invasive predictor of improving the selection for endoscopic screening of PH patients at risk of EV.Noninvasive prediction of large esophageal varices in chronic liver disease patients.Esophageal varices (EVs) are a serious consequence of portal hypertension in patients with liver diseases. Several studies have evaluated possible noninvasive markers of EVs to reduce the number of unnecessary endoscopies in patients with cirrhosis but without varices. This prospective study was conducted to evaluate noninvasive predictors of large varices (LV).The study analyzed 106 patients with liver diseases from January 2007 to March 2008. Relevant clinical parameters assessed included Child-Pugh class, ascites and splenomegaly. Laboratory parameters like hemoglobin level, platelet count, prothrombin time, serum bilirubin, albumin and ultrasonographic characteristics like splenic size, splenic vein size, portal vein diameter were assessed. Univariate and multivariate analysis was done on the data for predictors of large EVs.Incidence of large varices was seen in 41%. On multivariate analysis, independent predictors for the presence of LV were palpable spleen, low platelet count, spleen size> 13.8 mm, portal vein> 13 mm, splenic vein> 11.5 mm. The receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve showed 0.883 area under curve. Platelet spleen diameter ratio 909 had a sensitivity and specificity of 88.5%, 83% respectively.Thrombocytopenia, large spleen size, portal vein size and platelet spleen diameter ratio strongly predicts large number of EVs.Non-invasive diagnosis of esophageal varices in chronic liver diseases.The primary prevention of bleeding from esophageal varices is a major therapeutic issue requiring early screening of esophageal varices. Our aim was to study the diagnostic accuracy of non-endoscopic means for the diagnosis of esophageal varices.Sixty-three clinical, biochemical, endoscopic and Doppler ultrasound variables were prospectively recorded in 207 consecutive patients with chronic liver disease. Diagnostic accuracy was evaluated by discriminant analysis, first globally using all variables with diagnostic accuracy > or = 65% in univariate analysis, then by stepwise regression.A) whole group (n=207), 1) diagnosis of esophageal varices: diagnostic accuracy was globally 81%, and 81% with 1 variable: irregular liver surface at ultrasound, 2) Diagnosis of large esophageal varices (grades 2+3): diagnostic accuracy was globally 80%, and 79% with 2 variables: prothrombin index, gamma-globulins. B) patients with cirrhosis (n=116), 1) diagnosis of esophageal varices: diagnostic accuracy was globally 71%, and 72% with 2 variables: platelet count, prothrombin index, 2) diagnosis of large esophageal varices (grades 2+3): diagnostic accuracy was globally 71%, and 72% with 3 variables: platelet count, prothrombin index, spider naevi. The ROC curve showed that the best threshold for the diagnostic accuracy of platelet count was 160 G/l providing a sensitivity of 80% and a specificity of 58%. Platelet count > or = 260 G/l has a negative predictive value > or = 91%.Using a few non-endoscopic criteria, esophageal varices can be correctly diagnosed in 81% of patients with chronic liver disease and in 71% of patients with cirrhosis. These results show that the non-invasive screening of patients who are candidates for the primary prevention of variceal bleeding is possible, but should be improved before being used in a clinical setting.Prediction of oesophagogastric varices in patients with liver cirrhosis.All patients with liver cirrhosis are recommended for evaluation of oesophagogastric varices (EGV) regularly. This prospective study was designed to develop a predictive model for EGV in cirrhotic patients.Ninety-two patients were recruited. From all patients studied, the size of palpable spleen, liver chemistry value, platelet count, prothrombin time, diameter of main portal vein and splenic length as assessed by ultrasonography were determined. Upper endoscopy was performed. Oesophageal varices (EV) and gastric varices (GV) were graded (EV, grade 1-4; GV, grade 1-3). In the predictive model, the EGV was classified into two grades (low, grade 1-2 EV or grade 1 GV; high, grade 3-4 EV or grade 2-3 GV).There were 53 patients with EGV and 39 patients without EGV as determined by endoscopy. Patients with EGV had a significantly higher degree of ascites and hepatic encephalopathy, lower platelet count and longer splenic length than those without EGV. Low platelet count and presence of ascites were the significant independent predictors for high-grade EGV (concordance rate 0.83). The optimal critical value for the platelet count was 150 x 10(9)/L. Of patients without thrombocytopenia and ascites, 37% had low-grade EGV but none had high-grade EGV, whereas 38 and 35% of patients with thrombocytopenia or ascites had low and high-grade EGV, respectively. Therefore, this predictive model for high-grade varices had a positive and negative predictive value of 35 and 100%, respectively.Endoscopic screening for EGV was not necessary until thrombocytopenia or ascites occurred.Non-invasive predictors of the presence of large oesophageal varices in patients with cirrhosis.The usual clinical practice is to screen all patients with established cirrhosis at the time of diagnosis by upper endoscopy for the presence of varices. Patients with large varices should be treated with non-selective beta blockers to reduce the incidence of first variceal bleeding. However, fewer than 50% of cirrhotic patients have varices at screening endoscopy and most have small sized varices, with a low risk of bleeding. The aim of the present study was to determine whether clinical or laboratory non-endoscopic parameters could predict the presence of large oesophageal varices.Seventeen variables considered relevant to the prevalence of oesophageal varices were tested in 184 patients with cirrhosis, who underwent screening endoscopy. Small varices were regarded as those which flatten with insufflation or slightly protrude into the lumen, while large varices are those which protrude into the lumen or touch each other. None of the patients was on beta blockers or other vasoactive drugs or had a history of variceal bleeding.Oesophageal varices were present in 92 patients (50%), and large varices in 33 patients (17.9%). Variables associated with the presence of large oesophageal varices on univariate analysis were the presence of ascites and splenomegaly either by clinical examination or by ultrasound (p < 0.01), the presence of spiders (p = 0.02), platelet count (p < 0.0001), and bilirubin (p = 0.01). Factors independently associated with the presence of large oesophageal varices on multivariate analysis were platelet count, size of spleen and presence of ascites by ultrasound. Using mean values as cut-off points, it is noteworthy that only five out of 39 patients (12.8%) with platelets > or = 18(x 10(9)/l), spleen length < or = 135 mm and no ascites had varices. Moreover, all these patients had small sized varices. On the other hand, 15 out of 18 patients (83.3%) with a platelet count < 118 x 10(9)/l, spleen length > 135 mm and ascites had varices. Moreover, five out of those 18 patients had large varices (28.3%).Thrombocytopenia, splenomegaly and ascites are independent predictors of large oesophageal varices in cirrhotic patients. We suggest that endoscopy could be avoided safely in cirrhotic patients with none of these predictive factors, as large varices are absent in this group of patients.The predictors of the presence of varices in patients with primary sclerosing cholangitis.The predictors for developing varices in patients with primary sclerosing cholangitis (PSC) have not been well studied prospectively. We sought to define the predictors for the presence of varices at baseline and for newly developing varices in patients with PSC. We used prospectively collected data from a multicenter randomized trial of high dose ursodeoxycholic acid for PSC. All 150 patients enrolled were reviewed for predictors of varices and we excluded 26 patients who had esophageal varices at baseline so that predictors of newly developing varices could be determined. Clinical examination, blood tests, and upper endoscopy were done before randomization, at 2 years and after 5 years. Liver biopsy was performed at entry and at 5 years. The median age (interquartile range) of patients was 45.9 years (35.8, 54.9). In a multivariable logistic regression, a higher Mayo risk score (> or =0.87) or a higher aspartate/alanine aminotransferase (AST/ALT) ratio (> or =1.12) were significantly associated with the presence of varices at initial endoscopy (odds ratio = 1.9 and 3.9). By the end of the study, 25 patients had new varices (20.2%). In a Cox model, after adjustment for baseline variables lower platelet count and higher total bilirubin at 2 years were significantly associated with the presence of new varices. The platelet count of 205 (x 10(9)/L) and the total bilirubin level of 1.7 mg/dL were the best cutoff values for the detection of new varices.A higher Mayo risk score and higher AST/ALT ratio were significantly associated with the presence of varices at initial endoscopy. Lower platelet count and higher total bilirubin at 2 years were significantly associated with an increased risk of developing new varices in patients with PSC.Blood ammonia levels in liver cirrhosis: a clue for the presence of portosystemic collateral veins.Portal hypertension leads to the formation of portosystemic collateral veins in liver cirrhosis. The resulting shunting is responsible for the development of portosystemic encephalopathy. Although ammonia plays a certain role in determining portosystemic encephalopathy, the venous ammonia level has not been found to correlate with the presence or severity of this entity. So, it has become partially obsolete. Realizing the need for non-invasive markers mirroring the presence of esophageal varices in order to reduce the number of endoscopy screening, we came back to determine whether there was a correlation between blood ammonia concentrations and the detection of portosystemic collateral veins, also evaluating splenomegaly, hypersplenism (thrombocytopenia) and the severity of liver cirrhosis.One hundred and fifty three consecutive patients with hepatic cirrhosis of various etiologies were recruited to participate in endoscopic and ultrasonography screening for the presence of portosystemic collaterals mostly esophageal varices, but also portal hypertensive gastropathy and large spontaneous shunts.Based on Child-Pugh classification, the median level of blood ammonia was 45 mcM/L in 64 patients belonging to class A, 66 mcM/L in 66 patients of class B and 108 mcM/L in 23 patients of class C respectively (p < 0.001).The grade of esophageal varices was concordant with venous ammonia levels (rho 0.43, p < 0.001). The best area under the curve was given by ammonia concentrations, i, e., 0.78, when comparing areas of ammonia levels, platelet count and spleen longitudinal diameter at ultrasonography. Ammonia levels predicted hepatic decompensation and ascites presence (Odds Ratio 1.018, p < 0.001).Identifying cirrhotic patients with high blood ammonia concentrations could be clinically useful, as high levels would lead to suspicion of being in presence of collaterals, in clinical practice of esophageal varices, and pinpoint those patients requiring closer follow-up and endoscopic screening.Prediction of esophageal varices in hepatic cirrhosis by noninvasive markers.To determine whether Model for End-stage Liver Disease (MELD) Child-Turcotte-Pugh (CTP) classification, AST to platelet ratio index (APRI), and laboratory tests could predict the presence of esophageal varices (EV) or varices which need prophylactic therapy (medium or large size EV).Three hundred patients with cirrhosis (193 men; mean age 53.1 years; majority with chronic C hepatitis) were prospectively analyzed. The presence of EV (any size and medium or large EV) was correlated with patients' characteristics (MELD, CTP classification, APRI, platelets count, and liver tests).One hundred and seventy-one patients (57%) had EV, of whom 35% (105) had varices which need prophylactic therapy (VPT). The distribution of EV according to CTP classification was as follows: A, 49%; B, 75.3% and C, 80%. Independent predictors of EV were: MELD higher than 8 (P=0.02); APRI higher than 1.64 (P=0.01); platelet count lower than 93,000/mm³ (P<0.01); aspartate aminotransferase higher than 1.34 × UNL (P=0.01), and total bilirubin higher than 1 mg/dl (P=0.04). MELD higher than 8 had the highest discriminative value for presence of EV (sensitivity=80.1%; specificity=51.2%; area under receiver operating characteristics=0.68). Factors independently associated with VPT were: thrombocytopenia (<92,000/mm³; P<0.01) and aspartate aminotransferase higher than 1.47 × UNL (P=0.03). Platelet count lower than 92,000/mm³ had sensitivity of 65.7%, specificity of 57.9%, and an area under receiver operating characteristics of 0.62 for the presence of VPT.High values on MELD are associated with EV and thrombocytopenia, with varices which need prophylactic therapy. As a result of their low sensitivity and specificity, it is suggested to maintain the recommendation of upper gastrointestinal endoscopy for all patients with cirhosis.Detection of esophageal varices in liver cirrhosis using non-invasive parameters.recent guidelines recommend that all cirrhotic patients without previous variceal hemorrhage undergo endoscopic screening to detect esophageal varices. The aim of this study is to evaluate clinical, laboratory and ultrasound parameters to detect esophageal varices.this is a cross sectional study. Fourty seven consecutive cirrhotic patients without history of variceal hemorrhage underwent upper endoscopy. Physical examination, laboratory and ultrasonography to find portal vein diameter and anterioposterior splenic measurement of each patient were also recorded.esophageal varices was detected in 36 of the 47 patients (76.6%). Using bivariate analysis we found that a platelet count of 82,000/ul (90.9% sensitivity; 41.7% specificity), portal vein diameter of 1.15 cm (75% sensitivity; 54.5% pecificity) and an anteroposterior splenic measurement of 10.3 cm (83.3% sensitivity; 63.6% specificity) were predictive factors for esophageal varices in liver cirrhosis.our data show that platelet count, portal vein diameter and anteroposterior splenic measurement can be used as non invasive parameters to detect esophageal varices in cirrhotic patients.A simple noninvasive score predicts gastroesophageal varices in patients with chronic viral hepatitis.Guidelines recommend upper endoscopic screening of cirrhotic patients for gastroesophageal varices. Cirrhosis is not always distinguishable from chronic hepatitis.To identify low-risk patients who can be spared upper endoscopy irrespective of a diagnosis of cirrhosis.We evaluated 13 nonendoscopic variables as predictors of esophagogastric varices in 254 patients with hepatitis B or hepatitis C-related chronic liver disease who underwent upper endoscopy.Any size varices occurred in 30.3% (77/254), and large varices in 12.2% of patients (31/254). Age >50 years [odds ratio (OR): 11.29; 95% confidence interval (CI): 2.33-54.67], platelet count <150,000/mmc (OR: 4.40; 95% CI: 1.85-10.45), albumin <3.6 g/dL (OR: 2.99; 95% CI: 1.31-6.79), and aspartate aminotransferase/alanine aminotransferase ratio >1 (OR: 2.83; 95% CI: 1.26-6.34) independently predicted varices by logistic regression. Using a score based on age >50 years, platelets <150,000/mmc, and aspartate aminotransferase/alanine aminotransferase ratio >1 (1 point/predictor), only 3.2% of patients with a score <2 had varices, all small.Patients with chronic viral hepatitis and a score <2 need not undergo upper endoscopy, as they are unlikely to have large varices. Because about 50% of our patients had this score, 50% of upper endoscopies may be safely avoided.Duplex Doppler ultrasound signs of portal hypertension: relative diagnostic value of examination of paraumbilical vein, portal vein and spleen.The sonographic parameters in portal hypertension (PHT) were examined in a consecutive population of 118 patients who had PHT diagnosed using specific endoscopic, sonographic and Doppler signs. A patent or enlarged paraumbilical vein was found in 85.6% of patients overall and 82.5% of patients with varices indicating a relatively high sensitivity. A portal vein diameter greater than or equal to 13mm was found in only 41.1% and greater than or equal to 15mm in only 20% of patients. A thrombosed portal vein and reversed portal vein flow were present in 3.4% and 5.3% of patients respectively. These signs have only been reported in the context of PHT and are felt to be specific for PHT, but both have a very low sensitivity. Portal vein velocities were highly variable suggesting that this is not a useful predictor of PHT. Splenomegaly was found in only 53.5% of patients demonstrating its poor sensitivity as a sign of PHT. Varices were found in 73.3% of patients overall, and in 100% of patients with a patent or enlarged paraumbilical vein combined with ascites. No other statistically significant correlation between varices and sonographic findings was demonstrated. We conclude that the presence of a patent or enlarged paraumbilical vein is a practical, useful and sensitive ultrasound sign to look for in the diagnosis of PHT.Non-invasive prediction of oesophageal varices in cirrhosis.Non-invasive predictors of varices in cirrhosis would reduce the need for screening endoscopies. Platelet count and spleen size have been shown to be useful parameters, in mixed groups of cirrhotics with different aetiologies. We evaluated this in two homogeneous groups with cirrhosis due to hepatitis C and alcohol. Non-invasive predictors appear promising in the former group, but less so in the latter group.Predictors of esophageal varices in patients with HBV-related cirrhosis: a retrospective study.All patients with liver cirrhosis are recommended to undergo an evaluation of esophageal varices (EV) to assess their risk of bleeding. Predicting the presence of EV through non-invasive means may reduce a large number of unnecessary endoscopies. This study was designed to develop a predictive model for varices in patients with Hepatitis B virus-related cirrhosis.The retrospective analysis was performed in 146 patients with Hepatitis B virus-related cirrhosis. The data were assessed by univariate analysis and a multivariate logistic regression analysis. In addition, the receiver operating characteristic curves were also applied to calculate and compare the accuracy of the model and other single parameters for the diagnosis of esophageal varices.We found the prevalence of EV in patients with Hepatitis B virus-related cirrhosis to be 74.7%. In addition, platelet count, spleen width, portal vein diameter and platelet count/spleen width ratio were significantly associated with the presence of esophageal varices on univariate analysis. A multivariate analysis revealed that only the spleen width and portal vein diameter were independent risk factors. The area under the receiver operating characteristic curve of regression function (RF) model, which was composed of the spleen width and portal vein diameter, was higher than that of the platelet count. With a cut-off value of 0.3631, the RF model had an excellent sensitivity of 87.2% and an acceptable specificity of 59.5% with an overall accuracy of 80.1%.Our data suggest that portal vein diameter and spleen width rather than platelet count may predict the presence of varices in patients with Hepatitis B virus-related cirrhosis, and that the RF model may help physicians to identify patients who would most likely benefit from screenings for EV.Platelet count/splenic size ratio: a parameter to predict the presence of esophageal varices in cirrhotics.To evaluate platelet count/ splenic size ratio as a non-invasive parameter to predict the presence and absence of esophageal varices in patients with cirrhosis of liver.An observational, cross- sectional study.The medical units of the Civil Hospital, Karachi, between October 2003 and October 2004.During one year of study, one hundred and thirteen (113) patients with cirrhosis of liver were studied. These patients were evaluated for the cause of chronic liver disease, ascites and splenic size by abdominal ultrasound, serum proteins and albumin, prothrombin time, complete blood count including platelet count and liver functions test. All the patients had upper GI endoscopy to determine if they had esophageal varices and were classified according to Child s-Pugh classification. It was determined if the platelet count/ splenic size ratio between the two groups was different and its relation to the presence or absence of esophageal varices was noted.Of the one hundred and thirteen (113) patients included in the study, 35(31%) were female and 78(69%) male. The mean age of these patients was 37.1(+/- 14.85) years. Thirty-eight patients had HBsAg, 59 had anti-HCV antibodies, 8 patients had both HbsAg and anti-HCV antibodies and the cause of cirrhosis in 8 patients was indeterminate. Fifty patients had ascites. Of 113 patients, 15(13.27%) were classified as Child s Pugh class A, 68(60.18%) in class B and 30(26.55%) in class C. Sixty-six (58.4%) patients had esophageal varices on upper GI endoscopy while 47(41.6%) had no endoscopic evidence of esophageal varices. The ratio between platelet count/ splenic size was found to be significantly (p < 0.001) different between patients who had esophageal varices and those who did not.Platelet count/splenic size ratio is an important and an independent parameter associated with the presence of esophageal varices.Diagnostic and Prognostic Values of Noninvasive Predictors of Portal Hypertension in Patients with Alcoholic Cirrhosis.Portal hypertension is a direct consequence of hepatic fibrosis, and several hepatic fibrosis markers have been evaluated as a noninvasive alternative to the detection of portal hypertension and esophageal varices. In the present study, we compared the diagnostic and prognostic values of the noninvasive fibrosis markers in patients with alcoholic cirrhosis. A total of 219 consecutive alcoholic cirrhosis patients were included. Biochemical scores and liver stiffness (LS) were compared with hepatic venous pressure gradient (HVPG). For the detection of clinically significant portal hypertension (CSPH; HVPG≥10 mmHg) in compensated patients, LS and LS-spleen diameter to platelet ratio score (LSPS) showed significantly better performance with area under the curves (AUCs) of 0.85 and 0.82, respectively, than aspartate aminotransferase-to-platelet ratio index, FIB-4, Forns' index, Lok index, (platelet count)2/[monocyte fraction (%) × segmented neutrophil fraction (%)], and platelet count-to-spleen diameter ratio (all P<0.001). However, for the detection of high-risk varices, none of the non-invasive tests showed reliable performance (AUCs of all investigated tests < 0.70). During a median follow-up period of 42.6 months, 46 patients with decompensated cirrhosis died. Lok index (hazard ratio [HR], 1.13; 95% confidence interval [CI], 1.05-1.22; P = 0.001) and FIB-4 (HR, 1.06; 95% CI, 1.01-1.10; P = 0.009) were independently associated with all-cause death in decompensated patients. Among the tested noninvasive markers, only Lok index significantly improved discrimination function of MELD score in predicting overall survival. In conclusion, LS and LSPS most accurately predict CSPH in patients with compensated alcoholic cirrhosis. In the prediction of overall survival in decompensated patients, however, Lok index is an independent prognostic factor and improves the predictive performance of MELD score. Non-invasive methods can predict oesophageal varices in patients with biliary atresia after a Kasai procedure.After a Kasai procedure, 70% of patients with biliary atresia develop chronic liver disease with portal hypertension and oesophageal varices.To investigate the role of new non-invasive parameters in predicting the presence of varices in patients with biliary atresia after a Kasai procedure and to identify the cut-off values of these parameters in predicting the presence of varices.31 patients with biliary atresia who had undergone a Kasai portoenterostomy were studied. Clinical, biochemical and abdominal ultrasound examination, liver stiffness measurement (LSM), LSM-spleen diameter to platelet ratio score (LSPS) and upper digestive endoscopy were performed.15 (47%) patients had oesophageal varices (Group A) and 16 had no varices (Group B). Median values of LSM (kPa) and LSPS were significantly higher in Group A than in Group B (LSM: 17.0 vs. 7.5, respectively; p=0.0001; LSPS: 19.62 vs. 2.94, respectively; p=0.0001). The optimal cut-offs for predicting oesophageal varices were: LSM>10.6 kPa (sensitivity: 87%, specificity: 87.5%, PPV: 87%, NPV: 87.5%, and AUC: 0.92) and LSPS ≥9.2 (sensitivity: 91%, specificity: 92%, PPV: 91%, NPV: 92%, and AUC: 0.96).Non-invasive methods can predict the presence of oesophageal varices in patients with biliary atresia; the sequential use of two non-invasive methods improves accuracy.Efficacy of transient elastography in screening for large esophageal varices in patients with suspicious or proven liver cirrhosis.To evaluate the liver stiffness measurement (LSM) using transient elastography (TE) to predict the risk of esophageal varices (EVs) in Chinese patients.In total, 46 patients with suspicious or proven liver cirrhosis underwent TE and liver biopsy. All participants were endoscopically screened for the presence of EVs and large EVs by two endoscopists who were blinded to the LSM status. Large EVs were defined as more than 5 mm in diameter. Receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curves for both TE and the platelet count/spleen diameter (PC/SD) ratio in predicting the presence of EVs or large EVs were calculated.Of the 46 patients, 30 (65%) had EVs including 19 (41%) with large EVs. The area under the ROC curve (AUROC) of LSM was 0.85 for the presence of EVs and 0.83 for large EVs, respectively. The cut-off values of LSM were ≥13.4 kPa for the presence of EVs and ≥14.6 kPa for large EVs. Notably, the AUROC of the PC/SD ratio was 0.92 for the presence of EVs but only 0.69 for large EVs.LSM using TE can predict the presence of EVs or large EVs in Chinese patients with suspicious or proven cirrhosis and may identify patients who require endoscopic surveillance.Complete blood count reflects the degree of oesophageal varices and liver fibrosis in virus-related chronic liver disease patients.To optimize management of chronic liver disease (CLD), a simple and noninvasive test to determine oesophageal varices (EV) and liver fibrosis is necessary. We performed a cohort study in a single tertiary care centre in order to devise a simple index reflecting EV and liver fibrosis. We derived an index reflecting EV which resulted from portal hypertension (the first part) and evaluated the index's ability to detect liver fibrosis which resulted in portal hypertension (the second part). Five hundred fifty-six patients (the first part, n = 409, mean age = 55.4 years, EV prevalence = 34.0%; the second part, n = 147, mean age = 48.8 years, cirrhosis prevalence = 12.9%) with virus-related CLD were included. P2/MS [(platelet count [10(9)/L])(2)/(monocyte fraction [%] x segmented neutrophil fraction [%])] was derived to detect EV. The area under the receiver-operating characteristic curve (AUROC) of P2/MS was 0.916 (95% confidence interval, 0.879-0.954) for detecting EV, and 0.905 (0.862-0.947) for detecting high-risk EV (grade >or= II or with red colour signs). P2/MS had AUROCs of 0.952 (0.904-0.999) and 0.873 (0.792-0.955) for histological cirrhosis (METAVIR F4) and significant fibrosis (METAVIR F2-F4), respectively, which were significantly greater than those of AST-to-platelet count ratio index (0.658, P < 0.001; 0.644, P = 0.003) and FIB-4 (0.776, P = 0.031; 0.707, P = 0.026). The predictive values of P2/MS were maintained at similar accuracy in subsequent validation sets. Our study suggests that P2/MS comprising only the complete blood count results is an efficient and noninvasive marker reflecting the presence of EV and the grade of liver fibrosis in patients with virus-related CLD. An independent external validation of P2/MS is required.Prediction severity of esophageal varices: a new cutoff point for Platelet count/ spleen diameter ratio.It is currently recommended that all patients with liver cirrhosis undergo upper gastrointestinal endoscopy (UGIE) to identify those who have esophageal varices (EV) that carry a high risk of bleeding and may benefit from prophylactic measures. In the future, this social and medical burden will increase due to the greater number of patients with chronic liver disease and their improved survival. The aim of this paper was assess value of platelet count/spleen diameter ratio (PC/SD ratio) for the prediction or screening of EV in cirrhotic patients.In this two years prospective study, patients with liver cirrhosis referred to Al -Zahra hospital enrolled. Patients underwent detailed clinical examination, blood tests (hematology, liver function tests) and ultrasonography. Size of esophageal varices was assessed at UGIE; Paquet's grades 0-III were classified as group A (0-I; No or Mild EV) and group B (II-III; Moderate to severe EV). PC/SD ratio was also measured as possible noninvasive predictive/screening tools. Degree of eEV was assessed at UGIE. The relationship of the presence and degree of EVs with PC/SD ratio was evaluated.Fifty consecutive cirrhotic patients (mean age+/-SD) was 52.1 (+/-16.2); 41 male and 9 female) were enrolled; nineteen 19 (38%) patients were placed in group A (No or mild EV) while 31 (62%) had endoscopic evidence of moderate to severe EV (group B). PC/SD ratio cut off value of 921 had 93% negative predictive value. PC/SD ratio found to be significantly (P<0.05) different between group of A and B.The PC/SD ratio is independently associated with the presence of EV and can predict its severity in patients with cirrhosis. Use of this cost effective parameter may help identify patients with mild or no EV who may not need UGIE to reduce costs and discomfort for these patients and the burden on health system.External validation of the platelet count/spleen diameter ratio for the diagnosis of esophageal varices in hepatitis C virus-related cirrhosis.Screening for esophageal varices (EV) is an important part of the diagnostic workup of cirrhotic patients.To independently validate the use of the platelet count/spleen diameter ratio for the non-invasive diagnosis of EV in patients with HCV-related cirrhosis and in a sub-group of patients with compensated disease.A platelet count/spleen diameter ratio cut-off value of 909 was evaluated for the diagnosis of EV in the whole population (n = 311) and in patients with compensated disease alone (n = 114). Compensated disease was defined as the absence of ascites as detected by abdominal ultrasound in patients who are not on diuretics and absence of hepatic encephalopathy.In the whole cohort (EV prevalence 49.5%), the platelet count/spleen diameter ratio 909 cut-off value had 96.9% positive predictive value, 100% negative predictive value, and 98.4% efficiency for EV diagnosis. In compensated cirrhotics (EV prevalence 26.3%), the platelet count/spleen diameter ratio 909 cut-off showed an excellent negative predictive value (100%) and a positive predictive value of 93.8%. for the diagnosis of EV.In patients with HCV-related cirrhosis, the platelet count/spleen diameter may be proposed as a non-invasive tool for EV diagnosis, especially in financially deprived developing countries.[Evaluation of the diagnostic test of index platelet counts / size spleen, as a predictor of the presence of esophageal varices in cirrhosis].To evaluate the platelet count/spleen diameter (PC/SD) ratio as a non invasive diagnostic test to predict esophageal varices (VE) in patients with cirrhosis.Diagnostic test study, retrospective analysis. Data was collected from patients with diagnosis of liver cirrhosis at gastrointestinal unit of Hospital Nacional Daniel Alcides Carrión between September 2010 and January 2011. Using a PC/SD ratio with a cut off value of 909, sensitivity, specificity, Positive and negative predictive values, positive and negative likelihood ratios were calculate.There were 47 patients; mean age of 60,74; etiology: alcoholic (25,5%); undeterminated (48,9%). Twenty-five percent patients had varices and 74,5% had no varices. The PC/SD ratio had a sensitivity of 40%, specificity of 75%, PPV of 82%, NPV 30%, LR (+) of 1,6 and LR (-) of 0,8.The PC/SD ratio was not an effective diagnostic test for esophageal varices.Risk factors for the presence of varices in cirrhotic patients without a history of variceal hemorrhage.Current medical management dictates that all cirrhotic patients without a history of variceal hemorrhage undergo endoscopic screening to detect large varices. However, referral for endoscopic screening of only patients at highest risk for varices may be most cost-effective. The aim of this case-control study was to identify clinical, laboratory, and radiologic findings that predict the presence of varices in patients with cirrhosis.Three hundred patients without a history of variceal hemorrhage underwent upper endoscopy as part of an evaluation before liver transplantation. Cases defined as the presence of any varices and cases defined as the presence of large varices were used for examining the risks associated with finding varices on upper endoscopy. Logistic regression was performed to evaluate associations between the presence of varices and patient characteristics.Platelet count and Child-Pugh class were independent risk factors for the presence of any varices and the presence of large varices. For the presence of any varices, a platelet count of 90 x 10(3)/microL or less (odds ratio [OR], 2.4; 95% confidence interval [CI], 1.4-4.0) and advanced Child-Pugh class (OR, 3.0; 95% CI, 1.6-5.6) were independent risk factors. For large varices, a platelet count of 80 x 10(3)/microL or less (OR, 2.3; 95% CI, 1.4-3.9) and advanced Child-Pugh class (OR, 2.8; 95% CI, 1.3-5.8) were independent risk factors associated with varices.Low platelet count and advanced Child-Pugh class were associated with the presence of any varices and with large varices. These factors allow identification of a subgroup of cirrhotic patients who would benefit most from referral for endoscopic screening for varices.Can we consider the right hepatic lobe size/albumin ratio a noninvasive predictor of oesophageal varices in hepatitis C virus-related liver cirrhotic Egyptian patients?The current guidelines recommend the screening of all cirrhotic patients by endoscopy, but repeated endoscopic examinations are unpleasant for patients and have a high cost impact and burden on endoscopic units. The aim of this study is to evaluate the optimal liver lobe size/albumin ratio and to compare this ratio with spleen size, platelet count and platelet count/spleen diameter ratio as potential noninvasive predictors of oesophageal varices in hepatitis C virus (HCV)-related liver cirrhosis in Egyptian patients.This prospective study included one hundred patients with HCV-related liver cirrhosis. All studied subjects underwent a detailed clinical examination, biochemical workup, upper gastrointestinal endoscopy and abdominal ultrasound. The platelet count/spleen diameter ratio and the right liver lobe/albumin concentration ratio for all patients were calculated.The 4 predictors demonstrated a high statistically significant correlation with the presence and grade of oesophageal varices (P values<0.001). The platelet count/spleen diameter ratio had the highest accuracy, followed by the right liver lobe/albumin concentration ratio, spleen size and then platelet count.The use of the studied noninvasive predictors, especially the platelet count/spleen diameter ratio and the right liver lobe/albumin concentration ratio, can help physicians by restricting the use of endoscopic screening only to patients presenting a high probability of oesophageal varices. This is especially useful in clinical settings where resources are limited and endoscopic facilities are not present in all areas. Such is the case in Egypt, where there is a large number of patients who require oesophageal screening for oesophageal varices.Platelet count is not a predictor of the presence or development of gastroesophageal varices in cirrhosis.Current guidelines recommend esophagogastroduodenoscopy (EGD) in patients with cirrhosis to screen for gastroesophageal varices (GEV). Thrombocytopenia has been proposed as a noninvasive test to predict the presence of GEV. There is no agreement regarding a specific platelet count (PLT) that can reliably predict GEV. The present longitudinal study aims to (1) further investigate the relationship between varices and PLT at the time of endoscopy, (2) investigate whether changes in PLT from the baseline over time can predict the development of GEV, and (3) investigate whether changes in PLT correlate with the hepatic venous pressure gradient (HVPG). A secondary analysis was conducted for 213 subjects with compensated cirrhosis with portal hypertension but without GEV enrolled in a randomized, placebo-controlled, double-blind trial of a nonselective beta-blocker used to prevent GEV. PLTs were obtained every 3 months, and HVPG measurements and EGD were done annually. The PLTs were compared between subjects who did and did not develop GEV. In a median follow-up of 54.9 months, 84 patients developed GEV. PLT was greater than 150,000 in 15% of patients at the development of GEV. A receiver operating curve did not show any PLT with high sensitivity or specificity for the presence of GEV. Subjects with clinically insignificant portal hypertension (HVPG < 10 mm Hg) whose PLT remained greater than 100,000 had a 2-fold reduction in the occurrence of GEV (P = 0.0374). A significant correlation was found between HVPG and PLT at the baseline, year 1, and year 5 (P < 0.0001).Cross-sectional or longitudinal evaluations of PLTs are inadequate noninvasive markers for GEV. Patients with mild portal hypertension whose PLT remains greater than 100,000 have significantly less risk of GEV. Although HVPG correlates somewhat with PLT, changes in PLT cannot be used as a surrogate for HVPG changes.[Noninvasive diagnosis of esophageal varices in cirrhotic patients].Variceal bleeding is a frequent and serious complication of cirrhosis. Early detection of varices by videogastroscope (VGC) is recommended in all patients with cirrhosis to determine the need for prophylactic treatment. Have been described noninvasive markers of the presence of esophageal varices, which could prevent the realization of VGC for that purpose.To determine and compare noninvasive (longitudinal diameter of spleen, platelet count, platelet reason / spleen) as predictors of the presence of esophageal varices.We retrospectively studied 125 patients with cirrhosis from any cause. They had VGC, blood count and abdominal ultrasonography. The diagnostic accuracy for determining the presence of esophageal varices or large varices according to the different variables was studied using the area under the ROC curve (AUROC).The prevalence of esophageal varices was 63.2% and 42.4% were diagnosed with large varices. The reason platelets/spleen and platelet count showed an AUROC of 0.74 for the detection of esophageal varices. The cut-off for the ratio platelets / spleen was 1.010 (sensitivity 72.15% and specificity 71.74%) for the presence of varices and 870 for the presence of clinically significant varices (sensitivity 62.26% and specificity 62.50%). The analysis according to these breakpoints showed that 23.6% of patients with scores higher than 1,010 had large varices and 45% of patients with values lower than 870 had not large varices.Although the reason platelets/spleen showed an AUROC acceptable, its implementation would entail a risk of not diagnosing large varices in almost a quarter of the population studied.Spleen stiffness measurement using Fibroscan for the noninvasive assessment of esophageal varices in liver cirrhosis patients.Splenomegaly in a common finding in liver cirrhosis that should determine changes in the spleen's density because of portal and splenic congestion and/or because of tissue hyperplasia and fibrosis. These changes might be quantified by elastography, so the aim of the study was to investigate whether spleen stiffness measured by transient elastography varies as liver disease progresses and whether this would be a suitable method for the noninvasive evaluation of the presence of esophageal varices.One hundred and ninety-one patients (135 liver cirrhosis, 39 chronic hepatitis and 17 healthy controls) were evaluated by transient elastography for measurements of spleen and liver stiffness. Cirrhotic patients also underwent upper endoscopy for the diagnosis of esophageal varices.Spleen stiffness showed higher values in liver cirrhosis patients as compared with chronic hepatitis and with controls: 60.96 vs 34.49 vs 22.01 KPa (P<0.0001). In the case of liver cirrhosis, spleen stiffness was significantly higher in patients with varices as compared with those without (63.69 vs 47.78 KPa, P<0.0001), 52.5 KPa being the best cut-off value, with an area under the receiver operating characteristic of 0.74. Using both liver and spleen stiffness measurement we correctly predicted the presence of esophageal varices with 89.95% diagnostic accuracy.Spleen stiffness can be assessed using transient elastography, its value increasing as the liver disease progresses. In liver cirrhosis patients spleen stiffness can predict the presence, but not the grade of esophageal varices. Esophageal varices' presence can be better predicted if both spleen and liver stiffness measurements are used.Non-invasive predictors of esophageous varices in children and adolescents with chronic liver disease or extrahepatic portal venous obstruction.To identify non-invasive predictors of esophageal varices in children and adolescents with chronic liver disease or extrahepatic portal venous obstruction (EHPVO).53 patients younger than 20 years with chronic liver disease or EHPVO and no history of bleeding or prophylactic treatment of esophageal varices (EV) were assessed. They were divided into 2 groups: group I (35 with chronic liver disease) and group II (18 with EHPVO). Their blood count, international normalized ratio (INR), albumin, bilirubin, abdominal ultrasonography and upper endoscopy results were taken. A splenic index was determined by dividing the patients' spleen dimension by its uppermost limit according to their age. The variables were compared to EV presence or not. Univariate (chi-square test, Fischer's exact test and Wilcoxon exact test) and multivariate (logistic regression) analyses were performed. A receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve was constructed and the area under the ROC curve was calculated.EV were observed in 48.5% of group I patients and in 83.3% of group II patients. Low platelet count (p = 0.0015), splenomegaly (p = 0.0003) and splenic index (p = 0.0007) were statistically significant predictors of EV among group I patients. The multivariate analysis showed low platelet count (odds = 21.7) as an independent predictor of EV in patients with chronic liver disease.Platelet count, splenic index and platelet-splenic index ratio were predictors of EV in children and adolescents with chronic liver disease. There were no EV predictors among group II patients.Prevalence and predictors of esophageal varices in patients with primary biliary cirrhosis.Esophageal varices and bleeding are among the most feared complications of primary biliary cirrhosis (PBC). We aimed to determine the prevalence of esophageal varices in patients with PBC, to evaluate noninvasive markers of esophageal varices in this population, and to validate the results in an independent set of patients.Data were collected on all patients with PBC seen for the first time at the University of Florida (study group) and at Case Western Reserve University hospitals (cross-validation group) during 7 consecutive years. Logistic regression analysis was used to identify independent predictors of esophageal varices. The best cut-off values were calculated based on receiver operating characteristic curves. The diagnostic accuracy of the independent predictors of esophageal varices identified in the study group were retested in the cross-validation group.Of 210 patients with PBC seen at the University of Florida, 113 had an endoscopy and 49.6% (56 of 113) were found to have esophageal varices. After excluding 22 patients with a history of variceal bleeding, data on 91 patients were analyzed. Thirty-four patients had esophageal varices (37%). Multivariate analysis revealed that a platelet count of less than 140,000 (odds ratio, 7.6; 95% confidence interval, 1.6-37) and a Mayo risk score of 4.5 or greater (odds ratio, 10.6; 95% confidence interval, 1.8-62) were independent predictors of esophageal varices. The diagnostic accuracy of these predictors was confirmed in an independent set of patients.Among patients with PBC, a platelet count of less than 140,000 and/or a Mayo risk score of 4.5 or greater appears to identify those patients more likely to benefit from a screening endoscopy.Platelet count to spleen diameter ratio for the diagnosis of esophageal varices: Is it feasible?To study the value of platelet count to spleen diameter ratio as a noninvasive parameter for diagnosing esophageal varices (EVs) in liver cirrhosis.The laboratory and ultrasonographic variables were prospectively evaluated in 150 patients with liver cirrhosis. Only stable patients were included in the study. Patients with active gastrointestinal bleeding at the time of admission were excluded. All patients underwent screening upper gastrointestinal endoscopy.The platelet count, spleen diameter and platelet count to spleen diameter ratio in patients with EVs were significantly different from patients without EVs. The platelet count to spleen diameter ratio had the highest accuracy among the three parameters. By applying receiver operating characteristic curves, a platelet count to spleen diameter ratio cut-off value of 1014 was obtained, which gave positive and negative predictive values of 95.4% and 95.1%, respectively. The accuracy of this cut-off value as evaluated by applying receiver operating characteristic curves was 0.942 (95% CI 0.890 to 0.995).Among the noninvasive parameters studied, platelet count to spleen diameter ratio had the highest accuracy for diagnosing EVs. However, the evidence for the noninvasive diagnosis is not yet sufficient to replace endoscopy as a diagnostic screening tool for EVs in all cirrhotic patients. The platelet count to spleen diameter ratio may be a useful tool for diagnosing EVs in liver cirrhosis noninvasively when endoscopy facilities are not available.Use of the platelet count/spleen diameter ratio for the noninvasive diagnosis of esophageal varices in patients with schistosomiasis.In patients with liver cirrhosis, the platelet count/spleen diameter ratio has been validated as a parameter for the noninvasive diagnosis of esophageal varices. Schistosoma infection is a frequent cause of portal hypertension in Middle Eastern countries, and is associated with the development of esophageal varices. In this study we aimed to evaluate the platelet count/spleen diameter ratio as a noninvasive tool for the prediction of the presence of esophageal varices in patients with schistosoma-related chronic liver disease.Forty-three patients with hepatosplenic schistosomiasis underwent upper digestive endoscopy to check for the presence of esophageal varices. Furthermore, all patients underwent abdominal ultrasonography, and maximum spleen diameter (in mm) was measured. The platelet count/spleen diameter ratio was calculated in all patients.Esophageal varices were found in 31 patients (72%). Age and gender were not significantly different between patients with and without varices. In patients with varices, median platelet count (82,000/μL versus 172,000/μL, P < 0.0001) and platelet count/spleen diameter ratio (571 versus 1651, P < 0.0001) were significantly lower, while spleen diameter (147 mm versus 109 mm, P = 0.0006) was significantly larger. In multivariate analysis, the platelet count/spleen diameter ratio was the only parameter independently associated with the presence of varices (P < 0.0001).In this study we have validated the use of the platelet count/spleen diameter ratio for the noninvasive diagnosis of esophageal varices in patients with portal hypertension caused by schistosoma infection. In these patients, the platelet count/spleen diameter ratio might be used to allow better rationalization of medical resources and use of endoscopy.Factors predicting the presence of esophageal or gastric varices in patients with advanced liver disease.Recently it has been recommended that all cirrhotic patients without previous variceal hemorrhage undergo endoscopic screening to detect varices and that those with large varices should be treated with beta-blockers (American College of Gastroenterology guidelines). However, endoscopic screening only of patients at highest risk for varices may be the most cost effective.Ninety-eight patients without a history of variceal hemorrhage underwent esophagogastroduodenoscopy as part of a liver transplant evaluation. Univariate/multivariate analysis was used to evaluate associations between the presence of varices and patient characteristics including etiology of liver disease, Child-Pugh class, physical findings (spider angiomata, splenomegaly, and ascites), encephalopathy, laboratory parameters (prothrombin time, albumin, bilirubin, BUN, creatinine, and platelets), and abdominal ultrasound findings (portal vein diameter/flow, splenomegaly, and ascites).The causes of cirrhosis among the 67 men and 31 women (mean age, 48 yr) included 28% Hepatitis C/alcoholism, 25% Hepatitis C, 13% alcoholism, 9% primary sclerosing cholangitis/primary biliary cirrhosis, 9% cryptogenic, 6% Hepatitis B, 1% Hepatitis B and C, and 9% other. Patients were Child-Pugh class A 34%, B 51%, and C 15%. Endoscopic findings included esophageal varices in 68% of patients (30% were large), gastric varices in 15%, and portal hypertensive gastropathy in 58%. Platelet count <88,000 was the only parameter identified by univariate/multivariate analysis (p < 0.05) as associated with the presence of large esophageal varices (odds ratio 5.5; 95% confidence interval 1.8-20.6) or gastric varices (odds ratio 5; 95% confidence interval 1.4-23).Platelet count <88,000 is associated with the presence of esophagogastric varices. A large prospective study is needed to verify and validate these findings and may allow identification of a group of patients who would most benefit from endoscopic screening for varices.Correlation between splenomegaly and oesophageal varices in patients with liver cirrhosis.Derivation of a clinical prediction rule for the noninvasive diagnosis of varices in children.Identification of children who are at high risk for having varices using noninvasive tests would enable the selection of children for future studies of primary prophylaxis of variceal hemorrhage, but this has been inadequately studied. The objective of the study was to derive a noninvasive clinical prediction rule that is able to identify children with esophageal varices.Fifty-one consecutive children with liver disease or portal hypertension who underwent endoscopy were included in the present retrospective study. At endoscopy, variceal size was graded on a 4-point Likert scale. Results of physical examination, blood tests, and abdominal ultrasound scan (USS) were recorded. Spleen length on USS was expressed as a standard deviation score (z score). A descriptive univariate analysis was performed on variables that were potentially associated with esophageal varices and multivariate logistic regression was then modeled to derive a clinical prediction rule.Esophageal varices were found in 17 of the 51 children (33%). Variables found to differ significantly between children with and without varices included platelet/spleen-length z score ratio (P < 0.001), platelet count (P < 0.001), international normalized ratio (P = 0.001), aspartate aminotransferase/alanine aminotransferase ratio (P = 0.002), and albumin (P = 0.003). Using multivariate logistic regression, a model with platelet count, spleen length z score, and albumin as the independent variables had the best fit. Area under the receiver operating characteristic curve for this clinical prediction rule was 0.93 (95% confidence interval 0.85-0.99), sensitivity 94%, specificity 81%, positive predictive value 0.83, negative predictive value 0.94, positive likelihood ratio 5, and negative likelihood ratio 0.06.This clinical prediction rule is a simple noninvasive measure that may identify children at high risk for esophageal varices. A prospective validation study is in progress.A novel model to predict esophageal varices in patients with compensated cirrhosis using acoustic radiation force impulse elastography.Few noninvasive methods can accurately identify esophageal varices (EVs) in patients with compensated cirrhosis. We developed and validated a novel, acoustic radiation force impulse (ARFI) elastography-based prediction model for high-risk EVs (HEVs) in patients with compensated cirrhosis.A total of 143 patients with compensated cirrhosis between February, 2010 and February, 2013 (training set) and 148 between June, 2010 and May, 2013 (validation set) who underwent ARFI elastography and endoscopy were prospectively recruited. Independent predictors of HEVs were used to construct a prediction model.Based on multivariate analysis, we developed two new statistical models, a varices risk score and ARFI-spleen diameter-to-platelet ratio score (ASPS), the latter of which was calculated as ARFI velocity × spleen diameter/platelet count. The area under receiver operating characteristic curve (AUROC) of the varices risk score and ASPS to predict HEVs were 0.935 (95% confidence interval [CI] 0.882-0.970) and 0.946 (95% CI 0.895-0.977), respectively. When ASPS, a simpler model with a higher AUROC, was applied in the validation set, acceptable diagnostic accuracy for HEVs was observed (AUROC = 0.814 [95% CI 0.743-0.885]). To detect HEVs, a negative predictive value of 98.3% was achieved at ASPS <2.83, whereas a positive predictive value of 100% was achieved at ASPS >5.28.ASPS, a novel noninvasive ARFI-based prediction model, can accurately identify HEVs in patients with compensated cirrhosis. ASPS <2.83 may safely rule out the presence of HEVs, whereas patients with ASPS >5.28 should be considered for endoscopic examinations or appropriate prophylactic treatment.Prevalence and predictors of esophageal varices in patients with primary sclerosing cholangitis.Patients with primary sclerosing cholangitis (PSC) may develop and bleed from esophageal varices. However, the exact prevalence of esophageal varices in patients with PSC remains unknown and potential predictors of esophageal varices in this population have not been identified. Our aim was to determine the prevalence of esophageal varices in patients with PSC and the variables that predict their presence. Data were collected on 283 patients with PSC treated for the first time at the Mayo Clinic (Rochester, MN) during 8 consecutive years. Thirty-six percent (102 of 283) of patients had esophageal varices including 56% (57 of 102) with moderate/large varices. After excluding 28 patients with a history of variceal bleeding, data on 183 patients were analyzed to identify independent predictors of esophageal varices and of moderate/large size varices. Platelet count, albumin level, and advanced histologic disease were independent predictors of esophageal varices (area under the receiver operator characteristic [ROC] curve = 0.88). After controlling for the presence of advanced histologic stage and albumin levels, the odds ratios (OR) of platelet count less than 150 x 10(3)/dL for the presence of esophageal varices was 6.3 (95% CI: 2.6-15.8). The diagnostic accuracy of these results was corroborated by cross-validation of the data in an independent set of 72 patients with PSC (area under the ROC = 0.90). In conclusion, in patients with PSC, noninvasive markers of portal hypertension and of advanced liver disease predict the presence of esophageal varices. Our results suggest a clinically applicable and useful approach to identify patients with PSC who are more likely to benefit from endoscopic screening for esophageal varices.Platelet count/spleen diameter ratio: proposal and validation of a non-invasive parameter to predict the presence of oesophageal varices in patients with liver cirrhosis.Cirrhotic patients frequently undergo screening endoscopy for the presence of oesophageal varices (OV). In the future, this social and medical burden will increase due to the greater number of patients with chronic liver disease and their improved survival. In this study, our aims were (1) to identify clinical, biochemical, and ultrasonographic parameters which might non-invasively predict the presence of OV in patients with liver cirrhosis; (2) to evaluate the reproducibility of the obtained results in a different, although related, further group of patients; and (3) to assess the predictiveness of the identified rules in patients with compensated cirrhosis.In the first part of the study we retrospectively evaluated the presence of OV in 145 cirrhotic patients, and in the second part we evaluated the reproducibility of the study results in a subsequent group of 121 patients. Finally, we evaluated these parameters in a subgroup of 145 patients with compensated disease. All 266 patients underwent a complete biochemical workup, upper digestive endoscopy, and ultrasonographic measurement of spleen bipolar diameter. Platelet count/spleen diameter ratio was calculated for all patients.The prevalence rates of OV were 61% and 58% in the first and second groups of patients, respectively. In the first part of the study, we found that platelet count, spleen diameter, platelet count/spleen diameter ratio, and Child- Pugh class were significantly different among patients with or without OV, although the platelet count/spleen diameter ratio was the only parameter which was independently associated with the presence of OV in a multivariate analysis. A platelet count/spleen diameter ratio cut off value of 909 had 100% negative predictive value for a diagnosis of OV. This result was reproduced in the second group of patients as well as in patients with compensated disease. In a cost-benefit analysis, screening cirrhotic patients according to the "platelet count/spleen diameter ratio strategy" was far more cost effective compared with the "scope all strategy".The platelet count/spleen diameter ratio is the only parameter which is independently associated with the presence of OV, and its negative predictive value is reproducible. Its use is of value even in the subgroup of patients with compensated disease, and it is also cost effective.A clinical prediction rule and platelet count predict esophageal varices in children.The validation of noninvasive tests to diagnose esophageal varices is a priority in children because repeated endoscopic evaluations are too invasive. We measured the ability of a previously developed noninvasive clinical prediction rule (CPR) to predict the presence of esophageal varices in children.We analyzed data from 108 children, younger than age 18, who received endoscopies at 8 centers, to assess portal hypertension from chronic liver disease or portal vein obstruction. Blood test and abdominal ultrasound scan results were obtained within 4 months of endoscopy. Grading of varices identified by endoscopy was confirmed by independent blinded review. Spleen size, based on data from the ultrasound scan, was expressed as a standard deviation score relative to normal values for age.Of the children studied, 74 had esophageal varices (69%), including 35 with large varices (32%). The best noninvasive predictors of esophageal varices of any size were as follows: platelet:spleen size z-score ratio (area under the receiver operating characteristic curve [AUROC], 0.84; 95% confidence interval [CI] 0.75-0.93), CPR (AUROC, 0.80; 95% CI, 0.70-0.91), and platelet count (AUROC, 0.79; 95% CI, 0.69-0.90). The positive predictive values for the CPR and platelet count were 0.87 and 0.86, the negative predictive values were 0.64 and 0.63, the positive likelihood ratios were 3.06 and 2.76, and the negative likelihood ratios were 0.64 and 0.63, respectively. Based on positive and negative predictive values, the most accurate noninvasive tests were the CPR and platelet counts.Noninvasive tests such as CPR and platelet count can assist in triaging children for endoscopy to identify esophageal varices.Measurement of spleen stiffness to evaluate portal hypertension and the presence of esophageal varices in patients with HCV-related cirrhosis.The hepatic vein pressure gradient (HVPG) is the standard used to determine the degree of portal hypertension (PH) and an important prognostic factor for patients with cirrhosis; HVPG values correlate with the presence of esophageal varices (EV). However, HVPG can only be accurately determined at specialized centers; noninvasive methods are needed to predict HVPG values and the presence of EV. We compared the diagnostic performance of spleen stiffness (SS) measurement by transient elastography with that of liver stiffness (LS) and of other recently proposed noninvasive tests.We measured SS and LS in 100 consecutive patients with hepatitis C virus-induced cirrhosis. Patients were also assessed by FibroScan, HVPG, esophagogastroduodenoscopy, and liver biopsy. We also analyzed LS-spleen diameter to platelet ratio score and platelet count to spleen diameter.SS and LS were more accurate than other noninvasive parameters in identifying patients with EV and different degrees of PH. A linear model that included SS and LS accurately predicted HVPG values (R(2) = 0.85). The results were internally validated using bootstrap analysis.Measurement of SS can be used for noninvasive assessment and monitoring of PH and to detect EV in patients with hepatitis C virus-induced cirrhosis.Platelet count/spleen diameter ratio for the noninvasive diagnosis of esophageal varices: results of a multicenter, prospective, validation study.Noninvasive assessment of esophageal varices (EV) may improve the management of patients with cirrhosis and decrease both the medical and financial burden related to screening. In this multicenter, international study, our aim was to prospectively validate the use of the platelet count/spleen diameter ratio for the noninvasive diagnosis of EV.A total of 218 cirrhotic patients underwent screening endoscopy for EV. Platelet count/spleen diameter ratio ((N/mm3)/mm) was assessed in all patients and its diagnostic accuracy was calculated. On the basis of previous results, a platelet count/spleen diameter ratio cutoff of 909 was applied to this population. The diagnostic accuracy of the platelet count/spleen diameter ratio was further evaluated for both severity and etiology of disease subgroups.Prevalence of EV was 54.1%. The platelet count/spleen diameter ratio had 86.0% (95% CI, 80.7-90.4%) diagnostic accuracy for EV, which was significantly greater as compared with either accuracy of platelet count alone (83.6%, 95% CI 78.0-88.3%, P= 0.038) or spleen diameter alone (80.2%, 95% CI 74.3-85.3%, P= 0.018). The 909 cutoff had 91.5% sensitivity (95% CI 85.0-95.9%), 67.0% specificity (95% CI 56.9-76.1%), 76.6% positive predictive value, 87.0% negative predictive value, 2.77 positive likelihood ratio, and 0.13 negative likelihood ratio for the diagnosis of EV. Accuracy of the platelet count/spleen diameter ratio was maintained for both severity and etiology of disease subgroups.The platelet count/spleen diameter ratio may be proposed as a safe and reproducible means to improve the management of cirrhotic patients who should undergo screening endoscopy for EV.The prevalence and risk factors associated with esophageal varices in subjects with hepatitis C and advanced fibrosis.The factors predictive of the presence or the absence of esophageal varices in hepatitis C virus (HCV) and advanced fibrosis have not been defined.To define the prevalence of esophageal varices and the factors that are positively and negatively with such varices in hepatitis C and advanced fibrosis.A prospective study of esophageal varices and associated risk factors in subjects with hepatitis C and advanced fibrosis.Prerandomization data from the HALT-C (hepatitis C long-term antiviral treatment against cirrhosis) clinical trial.Subjects with bridging fibrosis or cirrhosis, who were virologic nonresponders to treatment with pegylated interferon alpha 2a and ribavirin, underwent endoscopy.Sixteen percent of subjects with bridging fibrosis (95/598) and 39% of subjects with cirrhosis (164/418) had varices (P < .0001); 2% of subjects with bridging fibrosis (13/598) and 11% of those with cirrhosis (48/418) had medium or large varices. Subjects with bridging fibrosis and varices had a significantly lower platelet count and higher bilirubin and international normalized ratio (INR) compared with those without varices, suggesting that the biopsy may have underestimated the severity of fibrosis. A platelet count >150,000/mm(3) was associated with a negative predictive value of 99% for esophageal varices. By logistic regression modeling, African American race and female sex were protective, whereas a lower platelet count and higher bilirubin and INR predicted varices (c statistic, 0.758).The risk of having varices increases with decreasing platelet counts, increasing bilirubin, and INR. The probability of having medium or large varices at platelet counts >150,000/mm(3) is negligible in this population.Utilization of platelet count spleen diameter ratio in predicting the presence of esophageal varices in patients with cirrhosis.To assess whether the platelet count/spleen diameter ratio is a useful noninvasive predictor of esophageal varices.Current guidelines recommend that all patients with cirrhosis undergo screening endoscopy for the presence of varices. Recent studies have focused on using noninvasive techniques to stratify cirrhotic patients according to their risk of having varices. One study examining the platelet count/spleen diameter ratio using a cut-off value of 909, yielded a negative predictive value of 100% for the presence of varices.A retrospective analysis of 137 patients with cirrhosis over the age of 18 that underwent screening endoscopy for varices between January 2003 and October 2005. The data collected were age, sex, etiology of cirrhosis, spleen diameter, prothrombin time/international normalized ratio, total bilirubin, platelet count, albumin, Child-Pugh score, and endoscopic findings.There were 137 patients with 87 (63.5%) men and a mean age of 56 years. Seventy-six (55%) patients had esophageal varices. The mean age, sex, and etiology of cirrhosis were similar between those with and without varices. Using a platelet count/spleen diameter ratio with a cut-off value of 909, yielded a negative predictive value of only 73% and a positive predictive value of 74%.The platelet count/spleen diameter ratio with a cut-off value of 909 may not be sufficiently accurate in predicting the presence of esophageal varices. Upper endoscopy remains the method of choice to screen for the presence of varices.Platelet count/spleen diameter ratio for non-invasive prediction of high risk esophageal varices in cirrhotic patients.Prophylaxis therapy is indicated in cirrhotic patients with large esophageal varices or small varices with red wale signs (high risk esophageal varices; HREV). Endoscopic surveillance to detect HREV is currently recommended. The objective of this study is to identify non-invasive predictors of HREV in cirrhotic patients.Adult cirrhotic patients without previous variceal bleeding were prospectively included. All patients underwent a complete biochemical workup, upper digestive endoscopy, and ultrasonographic measurement of spleen bipolar diameter. Platelet count/spleen diameter ratio (PC/SD) was calculated for all patients. The association of these variables with the presence of HREV in upper endoscopy was tested using univariate and multivariate analysis. Receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curves were constructed for variables associated with HREV.Sixty-seven patients were included. The prevalence rate of HREV was 50%. Age, gender (female), platelet count, spleen diameter, PC/SD ratio, total bilirrubin, prothrombin activity (INR), Child-Pugh score, clinical and ultrasonographic ascites were significantly associated with presence of HREV in univariate analysis. Age and PC/SD ratio were the parameters independently associated with HREV in a multivariate analysis, with OR 8.81 (CI 95%: 1.7-44.9) and OR 11.21 (CI 95%: 2.8-44.6) respectively. A PC/SD ratio cut-off value under 830.8 predicted HREV with 76.9% sensitivity, 74.2% specificity and 77.8% negative predictive value (ROC curve area: 0.78).The PC/SD ratio was significantly associated with HREV, but with suboptimal sensitivity and specificity. Therefore, the results of this study do not support the routine clinical use of PC/SD ratio for screening of HREV.Platelet count/spleen diameter ratio: analysis of its capacity as a predictor of the existence of esophageal varices.Upper gastrointestinal bleeding associated to esophageal varices is the most dramatic complication of cirrhosis. It is recommended screening every cirrhotic for esophageal varices with endoscopy.To evaluate the capacity of the platelet count/spleen diameter ratio in non-invasively predicting esophageal varices in a population of cirrhotics originated in an independent center from the one in which it was developed.The study included patients from the ambulatory care clinic of cirrhosis of a Brazilian hospital and studied platelet count, spleen diameter and presence of esophageal varices, as well as Child and MELD scores. It used a cutoff value of 909 for the platelet count/spleen diameter ratio, as previously published. A sample of 139 patients was needed to grant results a 95% confidence level.The study included 164 cirrhotics, 56.7% male, with a mean age of 56.6 ± 11.6 years. In the univariate analysis, platelet count, spleen diameter, presence of ascites, Child and MELD scores and the platelet count/spleen diameter ratio were related to esophageal varices (P<0.05). The platelet count/spleen diameter ratio had sensitivity of 77.5% (95% CI = 0.700-0.850), specificity of 45.5% (95% CI = 0.307-0.602), positive predictive value of 79.5% (95% CI = 0.722-0.868), negative predictive value of 42.6% (95% CI = 0.284-0.567) and accuracy of 68.9% (95% CI = 0.618-0.760). In the multivariate analysis, platelet count was the only variable which related to esophageal varices (P<0.05).Platelet count/ spleen diameter ratio is not adequate to predict esophageal varices in cirrhotics.Spleen stiffness in patients with cirrhosis in predicting esophageal varices.Screening for esophageal varices (EV) is recommended in patients with cirrhosis. Noninvasive tests had shown varying sensitivity (Se) and specificity (Sp) for predicting EV. Splenomegaly is a common finding in liver cirrhosis because of portal and splenic congestion. These changes can be quantified by transient elastography; hence, the aim of this study was to investigate the utility of spleen stiffness (SS) in evaluating EV in comparison with other noninvasive tests.We measured SS and liver stiffness (LS) by using FibroScan in 200 consecutive cirrhotic patients who met the inclusion criteria. Patients were also assessed by hepatic venous pressure gradient (HVPG), upper gastrointestinal endoscopy, LS-spleen diameter to platelet ratio score (LSPS), and platelet count to spleen diameter ratio (PSR).Of 200 patients enrolled, 174 patients had valid LS and SS measurement, and 124 (71%) patients had EV (small, n=46 and large n=78). There was a significant difference in median LS (51.4 vs. 23.9 kPa, P=0.001), SS (54 vs. 32 kPa, P=0.001), LSPS (6.1 vs. 2.5, P=0.001), and PSR (812 vs. 1,165, P=0.001) between patients with EV and those without EV. LS ≥27.3 kPa had an Se of 91%, Sp of 72%, positive predictive value (PPV) of 89%, negative predictive value (NPV) of 76%, and a diagnostic accuracy of 86% in predicting EV. LSPS ≥3.09 had Se and Sp of 89% and 76%, respectively, and a PSR cutoff value of 909 or less had Se of 64%, Sp of 76%, and diagnostic accuracy of 68% in predicting EV. SS ≥40.8 kPa had Se (94%), Sp (76%), PPV (91%), NPV (84%), and diagnostic accuracy of 86% for predicting EV. SS was significantly higher in patients who had large varices (56 vs. 49 kPa, P=0.001) and variceal bleed (58 vs. 50.2 kPa, P=0.001). Combining LS+SS (27.3+40.8 kPa) had Se of 90%, Sp 90%, PPV 96%, NPV 79%, and a diagnostic accuracy of 90%. HVPG (n=52) showed significant correlation with SS (r=0.433, P=0.001), LSPS (r=0.335, P=0.01), and PSR (r=-0.270, P=0.05), but not with LS (r=0.178, P=0.20).Measurement of SS can be used for noninvasive assessment of EV and can differentiate large vs. small varices and nonbleeder vs. bleeder.Noninvasive methods for prediction of esophageal varices in pediatric patients with portal hypertension.To evaluate clinical and laboratory parameters for prediction of bleeding from esophageal varices (EV) in children with portal hypertension.Retrospective study of 103 children (mean age: 10.1 ± 7.7 years), 95.1% with intrahepatic portal hypertension. All patients had no history of bleeding and underwent esophagogastroduodenoscopy for EV screening. We recorded variceal size (F1, F2 and F3), red-color signs and portal gastropathy, according to the Japanese Research Society for Portal Hypertension classification. Patients were classified into two groups: with and without EV. Seven noninvasive markers were evaluated as potential predictors of EV: (1) platelet count; (2) spleen size z score, expressed as a standard deviation score relative to normal values for age; (3) platelet count to spleen size z score ratio; (4) platelets count to spleen size (cm) ratio; (5) the clinical prediction rule (CPR); (6) the aspartate aminotransferase to platelet ratio index (APRI); and (7) the risk score.Seventy-one children had EV on first endoscopy. On univariate analysis, spleen size, platelets, CPR, risk score, APRI, and platelet count to spleen size z score ratio showed significant associations. The best noninvasive predictors of EV were platelet count [area under the receiver operating characteristic curve (AUROC) 0.82; 95%CI: 0.73-0.91], platelet: spleen size z score (AUROC 0.78; 95%CI: 0.67-0.88), CPR (AUROC 0.77; 95%CI: 0.64-0.89), and risk score (AUROC 0.77; 95%CI: 0.66-0.88). A logistic regression model was applied with EV as the dependent variable and corrected by albumin, bilirubin and spleen size z score. Children with a CPR < 114 were 20.7-fold more likely to have EV compared to children with CPR > 114. A risk score > -1.2 increased the likelihood of EV (odds ratio 7.47; 95%CI: 2.06-26.99).Children with portal hypertension with a CPR below 114 and a risk score greater than -1.2 are more likely to have present EV. Therefore, these two tests can be helpful in selecting children for endoscopy.[LOW SPECIFICITY OF PLATELET TO SPLEEN RATIO FOR NONINVASIVE PREDIC- TION AND CHARACTERIZATION OF ESOPHAGEAL VARICES IN PATIENTS WITH ALCOHOLIC LIVER CIRRHOSIS].Diagnosis of esophageal varices (EV) is based upon endoscopic examination, which is a rather unpleasant method that carries a certain risk of complications. For that reason, efforts have been made to develop noninvasive methods for characterization of EV. The aim of this study was to explore the value of platelet count to spleen size ratio (PSR) for noninvasive prediction and characterization of EV in patients with alcoholic liver cirrhosis (ALC). One hundred and seventeen patients (20 females and 97 males, mean age 60.7) with ALC were included in our research. All patients underwent endoscopic examination upon which the EV were classified as small (< 5 mm), large (> 5 mm), or absent. Spleen size (bipolar diameter in mm) was assessed by ultrasound. Platelet count to spleen diameter ratio was calculated and the values obtained were compared to the presence, size and risk of bleeding from EV as defined by endoscopy. No significant difference in PSR could be found between patients without and with EV (1.341 ± 0.725 vs. 1.053 ± 0.636, respectively; p = 0.06). The PSR was significantly different between the patients with small and large EV (1.103 ± 0.689 vs. 0.876 ± 0.314; p < 0.05) with a cut-off value of 1.141 (sensitivity 94.7%, specificity 38.2%, AUROC = 0.656; p = 0.042). The value of PSR below 1.182 pointed to patients at risk from variceal bleeding with 91.7% sensitivity and 38.5% specificity (AUROC = 0.625, p = 0.035). Based on our results, it is not possible to recommend the use of PSR as the exclusive noninvasive indicator for the presence, size and bleeding risk from EV due to its low specificity for these categories in patients with ALC.Prediction of esophageal varices in patients with cirrhosis.To identify predictors of esophageal varices (EV) using available clinical, laboratory, and diagnostic imaging variables.Patients with cirrhosis frequently undergo screening endoscopy for varices so that prophylactic therapy and/or follow up can be planned. It is unclear how often patients should be screened endoscopically for varices, and there are few data on the relationship of varices to nonendoscopic variables.Charts were reviewed for 247 consecutive patients with cirrhosis who underwent screening esophagogastroduodenoscopy for varices.A total of 184 patients (68 women) were studied. Ninety-four patients (51%) had varices; of whom, 90 had only EV (small, n = 66; large, n = 24), 13 had EV and gastric varices, and 4 had isolated gastric varices. The distribution of EV according to the Child-Turcotte-Pugh class was as follows: A, 35%; B, 60%; and C, 69%, with roughly equal prevalence of large varices (29%, 24%, and 24%, respectively) in each class. Independent predictors of large varices were thrombocytopenia ( p = 0.02) and splenomegaly ( p = 0.04) seen using imaging. A platelet count of less than 68,000/mm 3 had the highest discriminative value for large EV with a sensitivity of 71% and a specificity of 73%. Splenomegaly had sensitivity and specificity of 75% and 58%, respectively. Using these two variables, we placed patients into one of four groups, with a risk for large varices ranging from 4% to 34%.The prevalence of EV in cirrhosis increases with the severity of liver disease, as expected. Thrombocytopenia and splenomegaly are independent predictors of large EV in cirrhosis. Further prospective studies might result in a discriminating algorithm to predict which patients with cirrhosis would benefit from early or regular endoscopy to detect clinically significant varices.Predictors of large esophageal varices in patients with cirrhosis.Recent guidelines recommend that all cirrhotics undergo screening upper endoscopy to identify those patients at risk for bleeding from varices. However, this practice may not be cost effective as large esophageal varices are seen only in 9-36% of these patients. The aim of this study was to determine whether clinical variables were predictive of the presence of large esophageal varices.This is a retrospective analysis of cirrhotics who had a screening upper endoscopy during an evaluation for liver transplantation at three different centers and who had not previously bled from varices. A multivariate model was derived on the combined cohort using logistic regression. Three hundred forty-six patients were eligible for the study.The prevalence of large esophageal varices was 20%. On multivariate analysis, splenomegaly detected by computed tomographic scan (odds ratio: 4.3; 95% confidence interval: 1.6-11.5) or by physical examination (odds ratio: 2.0; 95% confidence interval: 1.1-3.8), and low platelet count were independent predictors of large esophageal varices. On the basis of these variables, cirrhotics were stratified into high- and low-risk groups for the presence of large esophageal varices. Patients with a platelet count of > or = 88,000/mm3 (median value) and no splenomegaly by physical examination had a risk of large esophageal varices of 7.2%. Those with splenomegaly or platelet count < 88,000/mm3 had a risk of large esophageal varices of 28% (p < 0.0001).Our data show that clinical predictors could be used to stratify cirrhotic patients for the risk of large esophageal varices and such stratification could be used to improve the cost effectiveness of screening endoscopy.Application of the platelet count/spleen diameter ratio to rule out the presence of oesophageal varices in patients with cirrhosis: a validation study based on follow-up.Screening for oesophageal varices represents an important part of the diagnostic work-up of cirrhotic patients. We have previously shown that the platelet count/spleen diameter ratio is a parameter that can rule out the presence of oesophageal varices safely and in a cost-effective fashion.To evaluate the prognostic and diagnostic accuracy of the platelet count/spleen diameter ratio for ruling out the presence of oesophageal varices in the follow-up of a cohort of cirrhotic patients without oesophageal varices at inclusion.After initial endoscopy, the 106 cirrhotic patients without oesophageal varices who participated in our previous study were followed-up with annual or biannual surveillance endoscopy. Patients were censored at the time of diagnosis of oesophageal varices or at their last visit, and at that time platelet count and spleen diameter were recorded. Sixty-eight patients made up the study cohort after excluding patients who were lost to follow-up or died before undergoing control endoscopy.During the follow-up, 27 patients (40%) developed oesophageal varices. Patients with higher baseline platelet count/spleen diameter ratios (p<0.0001) as well as a ratio above 909 were less likely to develop oesophageal varices (p<0.0005). At follow-up, a platelet count/spleen diameter ratio < or = 909 had 100% negative predictive value and 84% efficiency in identifying the presence of oesophageal varices.The use of the platelet count/spleen diameter ratio proved to be an effective means for ruling out the presence of oesophageal varices even in the longitudinal follow-up of patients.Measurement of spleen stiffness by acoustic radiation force impulse imaging identifies cirrhotic patients with esophageal varices.We evaluated whether spleen stiffness (SS), measured by acoustic radiation force impulse imaging, can identify patients who have esophageal varices (EVs); those without EVs would not require endoscopic examination.In a prospective study, we measured SS and liver stiffness (LS) in 340 patients with cirrhosis undergoing endoscopic screening for EVs and 16 healthy volunteers (controls) at the Kurashiki Central Hospital in Okayama, Japan. The diagnostic accuracy of SS for the presence of EVs was compared with that of other noninvasive parameters (LS, spleen diameter, and platelet count). Optimal cutoff values of SS were chosen to confidently rule out the presence of varices.Patients with cirrhosis had significantly higher SS and LS values than controls (P < .0001 and P < .0001, respectively). Levels of SS were higher among patients with EVs (n = 132) than controls, and values were highest among patients with high-risk EVs (n = 87). SS had the greatest diagnostic accuracy for the identification of patients with EVs or high-risk EVs compared with other noninvasive parameters, independent of the etiology of cirrhosis. An SS cutoff value of 3.18 m/s identified patients with EVs with a 98.4% negative predictive value, 98.5% sensitivity, 75.0% accuracy, and 0.025 negative likelihood ratio. An SS cutoff value of 3.30 m/s identified patients with high-risk EVs with a 99.4% negative predictive value, 98.9% sensitivity, 72.1% accuracy, and 0.018 negative likelihood ratio. SS values less than 3.3 m/s ruled out the presence of high-risk varices in patients with compensated or decompensated cirrhosis. SS could not be measured in 16 patients (4.5%).Measurements of SS can be used to identify patients with cirrhosis with EVs or high-risk EVs. A cutoff SS was identified that could rule out the presence of varices and could be used as an initial noninvasive screening test; UMIN Clinical Trials Registry number, UMIN000004363.Platelet count/spleen diameter ratio to predict esophageal varices in Mexican patients with hepatic cirrhosis.To validate whether the platelet count/spleen size ratio can be used to predict the presence of esophageal varices in Mexican patients with hepatic cirrhosis.This was an analytical cross-sectional study to validate the diagnostic test for hepatic cirrhosis and was performed between February 2010 and December 2011. Patients with a diagnosis of hepatic cirrhosis were included and stratified using their Child-Pugh score. Biochemical parameters were evaluated, and ultrasound was used to measure the longest diameter of the spleen. The platelet count/spleen diameter ratio was calculated and analyzed to determine whether it can predict the presence of esophageal varices. Upper gastrointestinal endoscopy was used as the gold standard. Sensitivity and specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and positive and negative likelihood ratios were determined, with the cutoff points determined by receiver-operating characteristic curves.A total of 91 patients were included. The mean age was 53.75 ± 12 years; 50 (54.9%) were men, and 41 (45.0%) women. The etiology of cirrhosis included alcohol in 48 (52.7%), virally induced in 24 (26.3%), alcoholism plus hepatitis C virus in three (3.2%), cryptogenic in nine (9.8%), and primary biliary cirrhosis in seven (7.6%). Esophageal varices were present in 73 (80.2%) patients. Child-Pugh classification, 17 (18.6%) patients were classified as class A, 37 (40.6%) as class B, and 37 (40.6%) as class C. The platelet count/spleen diameter ratio to detect esophageal varices independent of the grade showed using a cutoff value of ≤ 884.3, had 84% sensitivity, 70% specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of 94% and 40%, respectively.Our results suggest that the platelet count/spleen diameter ratio may be a useful tool for detecting esophageal varices in patients with hepatic cirrhosis.[The value of Doppler-ultrasonography and laboratory tests as non-invasive predictors of the presence of esophageal varices in patients with chronic liver disease].Upper gastrointestinal endoscopy is usually recommended for the evaluation of esophageal varices in patients with liver cirrhosis. However, the prevalence of varices is extremely variable. We performed this study to determine the predictive values for esophageal varices and to select eligible patients for screening endoscopy.Fifty-two patients were enrolled in this study. Laboratory tests including liver biochemistry and complete blood count along with ultrasonography with Doppler measurements and endoscopy were performed.Esophageal varices were present in 25 patients (48%). Variables associated with the presence of esophageal varices on univariate analysis were serum albumin, total bilirubin, prothrombin time and platelet count (p<0.05). Significant variables in ultrasonography with Doppler measurement were diameter of spleen (13.04+/-2.1 cm vs. 10.39+/-1.6 cm, p<0.001), peak velocity of portal vein (30.2+/-7.5 cm/sec vs. 36.1+/-8.0 cm/sec, p<0.01) and portal vein diameter (1.26+/-0.28 cm vs. 1.13+/-0.18 cm, p<0.05). On multivariate analysis, independent variables were platelet count (odds ratio (OR) 0.922; 95% confidence interval (CI), 0.86-0.99), diameter of spleen (OR 5.4; 95% CI, 1.63-17.88) and platelet count/spleen diameter ratio (OR 1.007; 95% CI, 1.01-1.02). The optimal critical value for the diameter of spleen was 11 cm. The sensitivity and specificity with this value were 84% and 63%, respectively.Doppler measurement was not helpful in distinguishing the presence of varices. However, clinical tests including biochemistry and ultrasonography would be useful in selecting eligible patients for screening endoscopy. Endoscopic screening for esophageal varices is recommended in cirrhotic patients with splenomegaly.Prediction of large esophageal varices in patients with cirrhosis of the liver using clinical, laboratory and imaging parameters.It is currently recommended that all patients with liver cirrhosis undergo upper gastrointestinal endoscopy (UGIE) to identify those who have large esophageal varices (LEVx) that carry a high risk of bleeding and may benefit from prophylactic measures. This approach leads to unnecessary UGIE in those without LEVx. We tried to identify clinical, laboratory and imaging parameters that may predict the presence of LEVx and help select patients for UGIE.This prospective study included newly diagnosed patients with cirrhosis and no history of gastrointestinal bleeding scheduled to undergo UGIE. Patients underwent detailed clinical examination, blood tests (hematology, liver function tests) and ultrasonography. Size of esophageal varices was assessed at UGIE; Paquet's grades 0-II were classified as small varices, and III-IV as LEVx. Association of LEVx with qualitative and quantitative parameters was studied using chi(2) and Mann-Whitney U-tests, respectively. Parameters found to be significant were tested in a forward-conditional multivariate logistic regression analysis to identify independent predictors. Receiver operating characteristic curve analysis was used to assess the efficacy of prediction models.Of the 101 patients (median age 45; range 15-74 years; 87 male; Child-Pugh class: A 18, B 31, C 52), 46 had LEVx. On univariate analysis, five variables were significantly associated with the presence of LEVx. These included pallor (P = 0.026), palpable spleen (P = 0.009), platelet count (P < 0.002), total leukocyte count (P < 0.0004) and liver span on ultrasound (P = 0.031). On multivariate analysis, two of these parameters, namely low platelet count and presence of palpable spleen, were found to be independent predictors of the presence of LEVx. A receiver-operating characteristics curve using the predictor function arrived at from this analysis had an area under the curve of 0.760.Presence of palpable spleen and low platelet count are independent predictors of presence of LEVx in patients with cirrhosis. Use of these parameters may help identify patients with a low probability of LEVx who may not need UGIE. This may help reduce costs and discomfort for these patients and the burden on endoscopy units.Clinical and laboratory predictors of esophageal varices in children and adolescents with portal hypertension syndrome.To determine the clinical and laboratory parameters that may predict the presence of esophageal varices in children and adolescents with portal hypertension.Overall, 111 patients with portal hypertension and no previous history of digestive bleeding underwent esophagogastroduodenoscopy for detection of esophageal varices. A univariate analysis initially was carried out, followed by a logistic regression analysis to identify the independent variables associated with the presence of esophageal varices. Sensitivity and specificity rates, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and the accuracy of the predictive variables identified among cirrhotic patients were calculated with the esophagogastroduodenoscopy as the reference test.Sixty percent of patients had esophageal varices on the first esophagogastroduodenoscopy. Patients with portal vein thrombosis and congenital hepatic fibrosis were 6.15-fold more likely to have esophageal varices than cirrhotic patients. When we analyzed 85 cirrhotic patients alone, splenomegaly and hypoalbuminemia remained significant indicators of esophageal varices. Only spleen enlargement showed appropriate sensitivity and negative predictive value (97.7% and 91.7%, respectively) to be used as a screening test for esophageal varices among cirrhotic patients.In reference services and research protocols, endoscopic screening should be performed in all patients with portal vein thrombosis and congenital hepatic fibrosis. Among cirrhotic patients, the indication should be conditioned to clinical evidence of splenomegaly or hypoalbuminemia. For clinicians, the recommendation is to emphasize the orientations given to guardians of patients with portal vein thrombosis and congenital hepatic fibrosis as to the risk of digestive bleeding. Cirrhotic patients with hypoalbuminemia and splenomegaly should receive the same orientations.Early detection in routine clinical practice of cirrhosis and oesophageal varices in chronic hepatitis C: comparison of transient elastography (FibroScan) with standard laboratory tests and non-invasive scores.To assess prospectively the accuracy of transient elastography (TE, FibroScan) for the detection of cirrhosis and oesophageal varices (OV) in chronic hepatitis C (CHC), as compared with currently available non-invasive methods (AST/ALT ratio (AAR), APRI, prothrombin index (PI), platelet count (PC), FibroTest (FT) and Lok index).All tests were performed the day of liver biopsy (LB), taken as reference, in 298 consecutive CHC patients (cirrhosis: 70; Child-Pugh A: 70; OV: 25).TE had the best diagnostic accuracy for detection of cirrhosis (AUROCs: TE 0.96 vs. FT 0.82, Lok and APRI 0.80, PC 0.79, PI 0.73, AAR 0.61, respectively; p < 0.0001). Overall, the percentage of saved LB was: TE (cut-off: 12.5 kPa) 90%, PC 82%, FT 79%, PI 77%, AAR 76%, APRI 70%, and Lok 45%, respectively. At a cut-off of 21.5 kPa, TE predicted the presence of OV with 76% sensitivity and 78% specificity and correctly classified 73% of patients vs. AAR 81%, Lok 77%, FT, PI 70%, PC 69%, and APRI 66%, respectively.TE is currently the most accurate non-invasive method for early detection of cirrhosis in CHC (cut-off: 12.5 kPa), as compared with other available methods, but cannot replace endoscopy for OV screening.PLATELET COUNT TO SPLEEN DIAMETER RATIO AND TO SPLEEN AREA RATIO AS PREDICTORS FOR ESOPHA-GEAL VARICES IN CHRONIC HEPATITIS C PATIENTS WITH LIVER CIRRHOSIS.Endoscopic detection of esophageal varices (EV) especially the high risk esophageal varices (HREV) is recommended in cirrhotic patients. There are several studies about non-invasive markers to predict the presence of EV. The aim of this study was to evaluate platelet count to spleen diameter (P/D) ratio and platelet count to spleen area (P/A) ratio as predictors for EV and HREV in patients with liver cirrhosis. This prospective study included 100 cirrhotic patients without previous variceal hemorrhage or endoscopic intervesion. Biochemical, imaging and endoscopic findings were collected in all patients. Several parameters including P/D and P/A ratio were measured and their association with the presence of EV and HREV was tested. The results showed that only P/D and P/A ratios were found to be independent predictors for the presence of EV and HREV in multivariant analysis. For prediction of the EV formation in cirrhotic patients, P/D ratio at value < or =979.9 and P/A ratio of < or =20.6 had area under the curve (AUC) 0.922 and 0.975 respectively with sensitivity 100%, specificity 30% for P/D ratio and sensitivity 100%, specificity 75% for P/A ratio. For prediction of the HREV formation, P/D ratio at value < or = 587.9 and P/A ratio of 513.7 had AUC 0.867 and 0.991 respectively with sensitivity 100%, specificity 50% for P/D ratio and sensitivity 100%, specificity 88% for P/A ratio.Platelet count/spleen diameter ratio as a predictor of oesophageal varices in alcoholic cirrhosis.Insulin resistance is a risk factor for esophageal varices in hepatitis C virus cirrhosis.Indirect methods to predict the presence of esophageal varices (EV) in patients with cirrhosis are not sensitive enough to be used as a surrogate for endoscopy. We tested the effectiveness of liver stiffness measurement (LSM) by transient elastography and the presence of insulin resistance (IR), a marker associated with fibrosis progression, in the noninvasive prediction of portal hypertension. One hundred four consecutive patients with newly diagnosed Child A hepatitis C virus (HCV) cirrhosis underwent upper gastrointestinal endoscopy to search for EV. Clinical, anthropometric, biochemical, ultrasonographic, and metabolic features, including IR by the homeostasis model assessment (HOMA), and LSM by transient elastography, were recorded at the time of endoscopy. EVs were detected in 63 of 104 patients (60%). In 10 patients (16%), the EVs were medium-large (>or=F2). By multivariate analysis, the presence of EVs was independently associated with a low platelet count/spleen diameter ratio (OR, 0.998; 95% CI, 0.996-0.999) and a high HOMA-IR score (OR, 1.296; 95%CI, 1.018-1.649), not with LSM (OR, 1.009; 95%CI, 0.951-1.070). It is noteworthy that nine of ten patients with medium-large EVs had a platelet/spleen ratio of less than 792 or an HOMA-IR of greater than 3.5. The independent association between low platelet count/spleen diameter ratio (OR, 0.998; 95%CI, 0.996-1.000), high HOMA-IR score (OR, 1.373; 95%CI, 1.014-1.859) and presence of EV was confirmed in the subgroup of 77 nondiabetic subjects.In patients with Child A HCV cirrhosis, two simple, easy-to-get tests, namely the platelet/spleen ratio and insulin resistance measured by HOMA-IR, regardless of the presence of diabetes, significantly predict the presence of EV, outweighing the contribution given by transient elastography.Validation of a multivariate model predicting presence and size of varices.A model developed by our group identified low platelets and advanced Child-Pugh class (CPC) as being associated with large varices.To validate a defined cut-off of platelets < or =80,000/microL in CPC-A for large varices and platelets < or =90,000/microL in CPC-B/C for any varices.Validation cohorts consisted of patients with cirrhosis undergoing screening for varices from Oregon Health and Science University (n=152), Indiana University (n=252), and Genoa, Italy (n=101). Similar clinical and laboratory data were collected as for the original cohort. To assess the ability of these cut-offs to predict presence of large and any varices, sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, likelihood ratios, and the c-statistic were measured.The validation cohorts were statistically different from the original cohort with regards to CPC and prevalence of large varices. Combining the original (n=301) and validation cohorts resulted in a negative predictive value of 92.1% for platelets < or =80,000/microL in CPC-A for large varices and positive predictive value of 80.1% for platelets < or =90,000/microL in CPC-B/C for any varices. Combining the 4 cohorts yielded a c-statistic of 0.67 (95% confidence interval: 063-0.72). No other factors such as splenomegaly and Model for End-Stage Liver Disease score were identified as significant.This study confirms the validity of a previous model identifying low platelets and advanced CPC class as predictors of large varices. Despite combining the cohorts, no other risk factors were identified.Non-invasive predictors of esophageal varices.Current guidelines recommend screening cirrhotic patients with an endoscopy to detect esophageal varices and to institute prophylactic measures in patients with large esophageal varices. In this study, we aimed at identifying non-endoscopic parameters that could predict the presence and grades of esophageal varices.In a prospective study, 229 newly diagnosed patients with liver cirrhosis, without a history of variceal bleeding, were included. Demographic, clinical, biochemical and ultrasonographic parameters were recorded. Esophageal varices were classified as small and large, at endoscopy. Univariate analysis and multivariate logistic regression analysis were done to identify independent predictors for the presence and grades of varices.Of the 229 patients (141 males; median age 42 years; range 17-73 years) with liver cirrhosis, 97 (42.3%) had small and 81 (35.4%) had large varices. On multivariate analysis, low platelet count (Odd's Ratio [OR], 4.3; 95% confidence interval [CI], 1.2-14.9), Child Pugh class B/C (OR, 3.3; 95% CI, 1.8-6.3), spleen diameter (OR, 4.3; 95% CI, 1.6-11.9) and portal vein diameter (OR, 2.4; 95% CI, 1.1-5.3) were independent predictors for the presence of varices. Likewise, for the presence of large esophageal varices, low platelet count (OR, 2.7; 95% CI, 1.4-5.2), Child Pugh class B/C (OR, 3.8; 95% CI, 2.3-6.5) and spleen diameter (OR, 3.1; 95% CI, 1.6-6.0) were the independent risk factors.The presence and higher grades of varices can be predicted by a low platelet count, Child-Pugh class B/C and spleen diameter. These may be considered as non-endoscopic predictors for the diagnosis and management of large grade varices.Gamna-Gandy bodies of the spleen detected with susceptibility weighted imaging: maybe a new potential non-invasive marker of esophageal varices.Portal hypertension (PH) is a clinical sequelae of liver cirrhosis, and bleeding from esophageal varices (EV) is a serious complication of PH with significant morbidity and mortality. The aims of this study were to assess the ability of 2D multislice breath-hold susceptibility weighted imaging (SWI) to detect Gamna-Gandy bodies (GGBs) in the spleens of patients with PH and to evaluate the potential role of GGB number as a non-invasive marker of PH and EV.T1-, T2- and T2(*)-weighted imaging and SWI were performed on 135 patients with PH and on 37 control individuals. Platelet counts were collected from all PH patients. Two radiologists analyzed all magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) data, and measured the portal vein diameter, splenic index (SI), and platelet count/spleen diameter ratio. The numbers of patients with GGBs in the spleen were determined, and the numbers of GGB were counted in the four MRI sequences in GGB-positive patients. The portal vein diameter, SI, platelet count, and platelet count/spleen diameter ratio of control individuals were compared with those of GGB-negative and GGB-positive patients on SWI images. The correlations among GGB numbers, the portal vein diameter, the SI, the platelet count, and the platelet count/spleen diameter ratio were analyzed.The GGB detection rate and the detected GGB number by using SWI were significantly greater than those by using T1-, T2-, and T2*-weighted images. The number of GGBs in the SWI images correlated positively with the portal vein diameter and SI and correlated negatively with the platelet count and platelet count/spleen diameter ratio.SWI provided more accurate information of GGBs in patients with PH. The number of GGB may be a non-invasive predictor of improving the selection for endoscopic screening of PH patients at risk of EV.Noninvasive prediction of large esophageal varices in chronic liver disease patients.Esophageal varices (EVs) are a serious consequence of portal hypertension in patients with liver diseases. Several studies have evaluated possible noninvasive markers of EVs to reduce the number of unnecessary endoscopies in patients with cirrhosis but without varices. This prospective study was conducted to evaluate noninvasive predictors of large varices (LV).The study analyzed 106 patients with liver diseases from January 2007 to March 2008. Relevant clinical parameters assessed included Child-Pugh class, ascites and splenomegaly. Laboratory parameters like hemoglobin level, platelet count, prothrombin time, serum bilirubin, albumin and ultrasonographic characteristics like splenic size, splenic vein size, portal vein diameter were assessed. Univariate and multivariate analysis was done on the data for predictors of large EVs.Incidence of large varices was seen in 41%. On multivariate analysis, independent predictors for the presence of LV were palpable spleen, low platelet count, spleen size> 13.8 mm, portal vein> 13 mm, splenic vein> 11.5 mm. The receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve showed 0.883 area under curve. Platelet spleen diameter ratio 909 had a sensitivity and specificity of 88.5%, 83% respectively.Thrombocytopenia, large spleen size, portal vein size and platelet spleen diameter ratio strongly predicts large number of EVs.Non-invasive diagnosis of esophageal varices in chronic liver diseases.The primary prevention of bleeding from esophageal varices is a major therapeutic issue requiring early screening of esophageal varices. Our aim was to study the diagnostic accuracy of non-endoscopic means for the diagnosis of esophageal varices.Sixty-three clinical, biochemical, endoscopic and Doppler ultrasound variables were prospectively recorded in 207 consecutive patients with chronic liver disease. Diagnostic accuracy was evaluated by discriminant analysis, first globally using all variables with diagnostic accuracy > or = 65% in univariate analysis, then by stepwise regression.A) whole group (n=207), 1) diagnosis of esophageal varices: diagnostic accuracy was globally 81%, and 81% with 1 variable: irregular liver surface at ultrasound, 2) Diagnosis of large esophageal varices (grades 2+3): diagnostic accuracy was globally 80%, and 79% with 2 variables: prothrombin index, gamma-globulins. B) patients with cirrhosis (n=116), 1) diagnosis of esophageal varices: diagnostic accuracy was globally 71%, and 72% with 2 variables: platelet count, prothrombin index, 2) diagnosis of large esophageal varices (grades 2+3): diagnostic accuracy was globally 71%, and 72% with 3 variables: platelet count, prothrombin index, spider naevi. The ROC curve showed that the best threshold for the diagnostic accuracy of platelet count was 160 G/l providing a sensitivity of 80% and a specificity of 58%. Platelet count > or = 260 G/l has a negative predictive value > or = 91%.Using a few non-endoscopic criteria, esophageal varices can be correctly diagnosed in 81% of patients with chronic liver disease and in 71% of patients with cirrhosis. These results show that the non-invasive screening of patients who are candidates for the primary prevention of variceal bleeding is possible, but should be improved before being used in a clinical setting.Prediction of oesophagogastric varices in patients with liver cirrhosis.All patients with liver cirrhosis are recommended for evaluation of oesophagogastric varices (EGV) regularly. This prospective study was designed to develop a predictive model for EGV in cirrhotic patients.Ninety-two patients were recruited. From all patients studied, the size of palpable spleen, liver chemistry value, platelet count, prothrombin time, diameter of main portal vein and splenic length as assessed by ultrasonography were determined. Upper endoscopy was performed. Oesophageal varices (EV) and gastric varices (GV) were graded (EV, grade 1-4; GV, grade 1-3). In the predictive model, the EGV was classified into two grades (low, grade 1-2 EV or grade 1 GV; high, grade 3-4 EV or grade 2-3 GV).There were 53 patients with EGV and 39 patients without EGV as determined by endoscopy. Patients with EGV had a significantly higher degree of ascites and hepatic encephalopathy, lower platelet count and longer splenic length than those without EGV. Low platelet count and presence of ascites were the significant independent predictors for high-grade EGV (concordance rate 0.83). The optimal critical value for the platelet count was 150 x 10(9)/L. Of patients without thrombocytopenia and ascites, 37% had low-grade EGV but none had high-grade EGV, whereas 38 and 35% of patients with thrombocytopenia or ascites had low and high-grade EGV, respectively. Therefore, this predictive model for high-grade varices had a positive and negative predictive value of 35 and 100%, respectively.Endoscopic screening for EGV was not necessary until thrombocytopenia or ascites occurred.Non-invasive predictors of the presence of large oesophageal varices in patients with cirrhosis.The usual clinical practice is to screen all patients with established cirrhosis at the time of diagnosis by upper endoscopy for the presence of varices. Patients with large varices should be treated with non-selective beta blockers to reduce the incidence of first variceal bleeding. However, fewer than 50% of cirrhotic patients have varices at screening endoscopy and most have small sized varices, with a low risk of bleeding. The aim of the present study was to determine whether clinical or laboratory non-endoscopic parameters could predict the presence of large oesophageal varices.Seventeen variables considered relevant to the prevalence of oesophageal varices were tested in 184 patients with cirrhosis, who underwent screening endoscopy. Small varices were regarded as those which flatten with insufflation or slightly protrude into the lumen, while large varices are those which protrude into the lumen or touch each other. None of the patients was on beta blockers or other vasoactive drugs or had a history of variceal bleeding.Oesophageal varices were present in 92 patients (50%), and large varices in 33 patients (17.9%). Variables associated with the presence of large oesophageal varices on univariate analysis were the presence of ascites and splenomegaly either by clinical examination or by ultrasound (p < 0.01), the presence of spiders (p = 0.02), platelet count (p < 0.0001), and bilirubin (p = 0.01). Factors independently associated with the presence of large oesophageal varices on multivariate analysis were platelet count, size of spleen and presence of ascites by ultrasound. Using mean values as cut-off points, it is noteworthy that only five out of 39 patients (12.8%) with platelets > or = 18(x 10(9)/l), spleen length < or = 135 mm and no ascites had varices. Moreover, all these patients had small sized varices. On the other hand, 15 out of 18 patients (83.3%) with a platelet count < 118 x 10(9)/l, spleen length > 135 mm and ascites had varices. Moreover, five out of those 18 patients had large varices (28.3%).Thrombocytopenia, splenomegaly and ascites are independent predictors of large oesophageal varices in cirrhotic patients. We suggest that endoscopy could be avoided safely in cirrhotic patients with none of these predictive factors, as large varices are absent in this group of patients.The predictors of the presence of varices in patients with primary sclerosing cholangitis.The predictors for developing varices in patients with primary sclerosing cholangitis (PSC) have not been well studied prospectively. We sought to define the predictors for the presence of varices at baseline and for newly developing varices in patients with PSC. We used prospectively collected data from a multicenter randomized trial of high dose ursodeoxycholic acid for PSC. All 150 patients enrolled were reviewed for predictors of varices and we excluded 26 patients who had esophageal varices at baseline so that predictors of newly developing varices could be determined. Clinical examination, blood tests, and upper endoscopy were done before randomization, at 2 years and after 5 years. Liver biopsy was performed at entry and at 5 years. The median age (interquartile range) of patients was 45.9 years (35.8, 54.9). In a multivariable logistic regression, a higher Mayo risk score (> or =0.87) or a higher aspartate/alanine aminotransferase (AST/ALT) ratio (> or =1.12) were significantly associated with the presence of varices at initial endoscopy (odds ratio = 1.9 and 3.9). By the end of the study, 25 patients had new varices (20.2%). In a Cox model, after adjustment for baseline variables lower platelet count and higher total bilirubin at 2 years were significantly associated with the presence of new varices. The platelet count of 205 (x 10(9)/L) and the total bilirubin level of 1.7 mg/dL were the best cutoff values for the detection of new varices.A higher Mayo risk score and higher AST/ALT ratio were significantly associated with the presence of varices at initial endoscopy. Lower platelet count and higher total bilirubin at 2 years were significantly associated with an increased risk of developing new varices in patients with PSC.Blood ammonia levels in liver cirrhosis: a clue for the presence of portosystemic collateral veins.Portal hypertension leads to the formation of portosystemic collateral veins in liver cirrhosis. The resulting shunting is responsible for the development of portosystemic encephalopathy. Although ammonia plays a certain role in determining portosystemic encephalopathy, the venous ammonia level has not been found to correlate with the presence or severity of this entity. So, it has become partially obsolete. Realizing the need for non-invasive markers mirroring the presence of esophageal varices in order to reduce the number of endoscopy screening, we came back to determine whether there was a correlation between blood ammonia concentrations and the detection of portosystemic collateral veins, also evaluating splenomegaly, hypersplenism (thrombocytopenia) and the severity of liver cirrhosis.One hundred and fifty three consecutive patients with hepatic cirrhosis of various etiologies were recruited to participate in endoscopic and ultrasonography screening for the presence of portosystemic collaterals mostly esophageal varices, but also portal hypertensive gastropathy and large spontaneous shunts.Based on Child-Pugh classification, the median level of blood ammonia was 45 mcM/L in 64 patients belonging to class A, 66 mcM/L in 66 patients of class B and 108 mcM/L in 23 patients of class C respectively (p < 0.001).The grade of esophageal varices was concordant with venous ammonia levels (rho 0.43, p < 0.001). The best area under the curve was given by ammonia concentrations, i, e., 0.78, when comparing areas of ammonia levels, platelet count and spleen longitudinal diameter at ultrasonography. Ammonia levels predicted hepatic decompensation and ascites presence (Odds Ratio 1.018, p < 0.001).Identifying cirrhotic patients with high blood ammonia concentrations could be clinically useful, as high levels would lead to suspicion of being in presence of collaterals, in clinical practice of esophageal varices, and pinpoint those patients requiring closer follow-up and endoscopic screening.Prediction of esophageal varices in hepatic cirrhosis by noninvasive markers.To determine whether Model for End-stage Liver Disease (MELD) Child-Turcotte-Pugh (CTP) classification, AST to platelet ratio index (APRI), and laboratory tests could predict the presence of esophageal varices (EV) or varices which need prophylactic therapy (medium or large size EV).Three hundred patients with cirrhosis (193 men; mean age 53.1 years; majority with chronic C hepatitis) were prospectively analyzed. The presence of EV (any size and medium or large EV) was correlated with patients' characteristics (MELD, CTP classification, APRI, platelets count, and liver tests).One hundred and seventy-one patients (57%) had EV, of whom 35% (105) had varices which need prophylactic therapy (VPT). The distribution of EV according to CTP classification was as follows: A, 49%; B, 75.3% and C, 80%. Independent predictors of EV were: MELD higher than 8 (P=0.02); APRI higher than 1.64 (P=0.01); platelet count lower than 93,000/mm³ (P<0.01); aspartate aminotransferase higher than 1.34 × UNL (P=0.01), and total bilirubin higher than 1 mg/dl (P=0.04). MELD higher than 8 had the highest discriminative value for presence of EV (sensitivity=80.1%; specificity=51.2%; area under receiver operating characteristics=0.68). Factors independently associated with VPT were: thrombocytopenia (<92,000/mm³; P<0.01) and aspartate aminotransferase higher than 1.47 × UNL (P=0.03). Platelet count lower than 92,000/mm³ had sensitivity of 65.7%, specificity of 57.9%, and an area under receiver operating characteristics of 0.62 for the presence of VPT.High values on MELD are associated with EV and thrombocytopenia, with varices which need prophylactic therapy. As a result of their low sensitivity and specificity, it is suggested to maintain the recommendation of upper gastrointestinal endoscopy for all patients with cirhosis.Detection of esophageal varices in liver cirrhosis using non-invasive parameters.recent guidelines recommend that all cirrhotic patients without previous variceal hemorrhage undergo endoscopic screening to detect esophageal varices. The aim of this study is to evaluate clinical, laboratory and ultrasound parameters to detect esophageal varices.this is a cross sectional study. Fourty seven consecutive cirrhotic patients without history of variceal hemorrhage underwent upper endoscopy. Physical examination, laboratory and ultrasonography to find portal vein diameter and anterioposterior splenic measurement of each patient were also recorded.esophageal varices was detected in 36 of the 47 patients (76.6%). Using bivariate analysis we found that a platelet count of 82,000/ul (90.9% sensitivity; 41.7% specificity), portal vein diameter of 1.15 cm (75% sensitivity; 54.5% pecificity) and an anteroposterior splenic measurement of 10.3 cm (83.3% sensitivity; 63.6% specificity) were predictive factors for esophageal varices in liver cirrhosis.our data show that platelet count, portal vein diameter and anteroposterior splenic measurement can be used as non invasive parameters to detect esophageal varices in cirrhotic patients.A simple noninvasive score predicts gastroesophageal varices in patients with chronic viral hepatitis.Guidelines recommend upper endoscopic screening of cirrhotic patients for gastroesophageal varices. Cirrhosis is not always distinguishable from chronic hepatitis.To identify low-risk patients who can be spared upper endoscopy irrespective of a diagnosis of cirrhosis.We evaluated 13 nonendoscopic variables as predictors of esophagogastric varices in 254 patients with hepatitis B or hepatitis C-related chronic liver disease who underwent upper endoscopy.Any size varices occurred in 30.3% (77/254), and large varices in 12.2% of patients (31/254). Age >50 years [odds ratio (OR): 11.29; 95% confidence interval (CI): 2.33-54.67], platelet count <150,000/mmc (OR: 4.40; 95% CI: 1.85-10.45), albumin <3.6 g/dL (OR: 2.99; 95% CI: 1.31-6.79), and aspartate aminotransferase/alanine aminotransferase ratio >1 (OR: 2.83; 95% CI: 1.26-6.34) independently predicted varices by logistic regression. Using a score based on age >50 years, platelets <150,000/mmc, and aspartate aminotransferase/alanine aminotransferase ratio >1 (1 point/predictor), only 3.2% of patients with a score <2 had varices, all small.Patients with chronic viral hepatitis and a score <2 need not undergo upper endoscopy, as they are unlikely to have large varices. Because about 50% of our patients had this score, 50% of upper endoscopies may be safely avoided.Duplex Doppler ultrasound signs of portal hypertension: relative diagnostic value of examination of paraumbilical vein, portal vein and spleen.The sonographic parameters in portal hypertension (PHT) were examined in a consecutive population of 118 patients who had PHT diagnosed using specific endoscopic, sonographic and Doppler signs. A patent or enlarged paraumbilical vein was found in 85.6% of patients overall and 82.5% of patients with varices indicating a relatively high sensitivity. A portal vein diameter greater than or equal to 13mm was found in only 41.1% and greater than or equal to 15mm in only 20% of patients. A thrombosed portal vein and reversed portal vein flow were present in 3.4% and 5.3% of patients respectively. These signs have only been reported in the context of PHT and are felt to be specific for PHT, but both have a very low sensitivity. Portal vein velocities were highly variable suggesting that this is not a useful predictor of PHT. Splenomegaly was found in only 53.5% of patients demonstrating its poor sensitivity as a sign of PHT. Varices were found in 73.3% of patients overall, and in 100% of patients with a patent or enlarged paraumbilical vein combined with ascites. No other statistically significant correlation between varices and sonographic findings was demonstrated. We conclude that the presence of a patent or enlarged paraumbilical vein is a practical, useful and sensitive ultrasound sign to look for in the diagnosis of PHT.Non-invasive prediction of oesophageal varices in cirrhosis.Non-invasive predictors of varices in cirrhosis would reduce the need for screening endoscopies. Platelet count and spleen size have been shown to be useful parameters, in mixed groups of cirrhotics with different aetiologies. We evaluated this in two homogeneous groups with cirrhosis due to hepatitis C and alcohol. Non-invasive predictors appear promising in the former group, but less so in the latter group.Predictors of esophageal varices in patients with HBV-related cirrhosis: a retrospective study.All patients with liver cirrhosis are recommended to undergo an evaluation of esophageal varices (EV) to assess their risk of bleeding. Predicting the presence of EV through non-invasive means may reduce a large number of unnecessary endoscopies. This study was designed to develop a predictive model for varices in patients with Hepatitis B virus-related cirrhosis.The retrospective analysis was performed in 146 patients with Hepatitis B virus-related cirrhosis. The data were assessed by univariate analysis and a multivariate logistic regression analysis. In addition, the receiver operating characteristic curves were also applied to calculate and compare the accuracy of the model and other single parameters for the diagnosis of esophageal varices.We found the prevalence of EV in patients with Hepatitis B virus-related cirrhosis to be 74.7%. In addition, platelet count, spleen width, portal vein diameter and platelet count/spleen width ratio were significantly associated with the presence of esophageal varices on univariate analysis. A multivariate analysis revealed that only the spleen width and portal vein diameter were independent risk factors. The area under the receiver operating characteristic curve of regression function (RF) model, which was composed of the spleen width and portal vein diameter, was higher than that of the platelet count. With a cut-off value of 0.3631, the RF model had an excellent sensitivity of 87.2% and an acceptable specificity of 59.5% with an overall accuracy of 80.1%.Our data suggest that portal vein diameter and spleen width rather than platelet count may predict the presence of varices in patients with Hepatitis B virus-related cirrhosis, and that the RF model may help physicians to identify patients who would most likely benefit from screenings for EV.Platelet count/splenic size ratio: a parameter to predict the presence of esophageal varices in cirrhotics.To evaluate platelet count/ splenic size ratio as a non-invasive parameter to predict the presence and absence of esophageal varices in patients with cirrhosis of liver.An observational, cross- sectional study.The medical units of the Civil Hospital, Karachi, between October 2003 and October 2004.During one year of study, one hundred and thirteen (113) patients with cirrhosis of liver were studied. These patients were evaluated for the cause of chronic liver disease, ascites and splenic size by abdominal ultrasound, serum proteins and albumin, prothrombin time, complete blood count including platelet count and liver functions test. All the patients had upper GI endoscopy to determine if they had esophageal varices and were classified according to Child s-Pugh classification. It was determined if the platelet count/ splenic size ratio between the two groups was different and its relation to the presence or absence of esophageal varices was noted.Of the one hundred and thirteen (113) patients included in the study, 35(31%) were female and 78(69%) male. The mean age of these patients was 37.1(+/- 14.85) years. Thirty-eight patients had HBsAg, 59 had anti-HCV antibodies, 8 patients had both HbsAg and anti-HCV antibodies and the cause of cirrhosis in 8 patients was indeterminate. Fifty patients had ascites. Of 113 patients, 15(13.27%) were classified as Child s Pugh class A, 68(60.18%) in class B and 30(26.55%) in class C. Sixty-six (58.4%) patients had esophageal varices on upper GI endoscopy while 47(41.6%) had no endoscopic evidence of esophageal varices. The ratio between platelet count/ splenic size was found to be significantly (p < 0.001) different between patients who had esophageal varices and those who did not.Platelet count/splenic size ratio is an important and an independent parameter associated with the presence of esophageal varices.Diagnostic and Prognostic Values of Noninvasive Predictors of Portal Hypertension in Patients with Alcoholic Cirrhosis.Portal hypertension is a direct consequence of hepatic fibrosis, and several hepatic fibrosis markers have been evaluated as a noninvasive alternative to the detection of portal hypertension and esophageal varices. In the present study, we compared the diagnostic and prognostic values of the noninvasive fibrosis markers in patients with alcoholic cirrhosis. A total of 219 consecutive alcoholic cirrhosis patients were included. Biochemical scores and liver stiffness (LS) were compared with hepatic venous pressure gradient (HVPG). For the detection of clinically significant portal hypertension (CSPH; HVPG≥10 mmHg) in compensated patients, LS and LS-spleen diameter to platelet ratio score (LSPS) showed significantly better performance with area under the curves (AUCs) of 0.85 and 0.82, respectively, than aspartate aminotransferase-to-platelet ratio index, FIB-4, Forns' index, Lok index, (platelet count)2/[monocyte fraction (%) × segmented neutrophil fraction (%)], and platelet count-to-spleen diameter ratio (all P<0.001). However, for the detection of high-risk varices, none of the non-invasive tests showed reliable performance (AUCs of all investigated tests < 0.70). During a median follow-up period of 42.6 months, 46 patients with decompensated cirrhosis died. Lok index (hazard ratio [HR], 1.13; 95% confidence interval [CI], 1.05-1.22; P = 0.001) and FIB-4 (HR, 1.06; 95% CI, 1.01-1.10; P = 0.009) were independently associated with all-cause death in decompensated patients. Among the tested noninvasive markers, only Lok index significantly improved discrimination function of MELD score in predicting overall survival. In conclusion, LS and LSPS most accurately predict CSPH in patients with compensated alcoholic cirrhosis. In the prediction of overall survival in decompensated patients, however, Lok index is an independent prognostic factor and improves the predictive performance of MELD score. Non-invasive methods can predict oesophageal varices in patients with biliary atresia after a Kasai procedure.After a Kasai procedure, 70% of patients with biliary atresia develop chronic liver disease with portal hypertension and oesophageal varices.To investigate the role of new non-invasive parameters in predicting the presence of varices in patients with biliary atresia after a Kasai procedure and to identify the cut-off values of these parameters in predicting the presence of varices.31 patients with biliary atresia who had undergone a Kasai portoenterostomy were studied. Clinical, biochemical and abdominal ultrasound examination, liver stiffness measurement (LSM), LSM-spleen diameter to platelet ratio score (LSPS) and upper digestive endoscopy were performed.15 (47%) patients had oesophageal varices (Group A) and 16 had no varices (Group B). Median values of LSM (kPa) and LSPS were significantly higher in Group A than in Group B (LSM: 17.0 vs. 7.5, respectively; p=0.0001; LSPS: 19.62 vs. 2.94, respectively; p=0.0001). The optimal cut-offs for predicting oesophageal varices were: LSM>10.6 kPa (sensitivity: 87%, specificity: 87.5%, PPV: 87%, NPV: 87.5%, and AUC: 0.92) and LSPS ≥9.2 (sensitivity: 91%, specificity: 92%, PPV: 91%, NPV: 92%, and AUC: 0.96).Non-invasive methods can predict the presence of oesophageal varices in patients with biliary atresia; the sequential use of two non-invasive methods improves accuracy.Efficacy of transient elastography in screening for large esophageal varices in patients with suspicious or proven liver cirrhosis.To evaluate the liver stiffness measurement (LSM) using transient elastography (TE) to predict the risk of esophageal varices (EVs) in Chinese patients.In total, 46 patients with suspicious or proven liver cirrhosis underwent TE and liver biopsy. All participants were endoscopically screened for the presence of EVs and large EVs by two endoscopists who were blinded to the LSM status. Large EVs were defined as more than 5 mm in diameter. Receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curves for both TE and the platelet count/spleen diameter (PC/SD) ratio in predicting the presence of EVs or large EVs were calculated.Of the 46 patients, 30 (65%) had EVs including 19 (41%) with large EVs. The area under the ROC curve (AUROC) of LSM was 0.85 for the presence of EVs and 0.83 for large EVs, respectively. The cut-off values of LSM were ≥13.4 kPa for the presence of EVs and ≥14.6 kPa for large EVs. Notably, the AUROC of the PC/SD ratio was 0.92 for the presence of EVs but only 0.69 for large EVs.LSM using TE can predict the presence of EVs or large EVs in Chinese patients with suspicious or proven cirrhosis and may identify patients who require endoscopic surveillance.Complete blood count reflects the degree of oesophageal varices and liver fibrosis in virus-related chronic liver disease patients.To optimize management of chronic liver disease (CLD), a simple and noninvasive test to determine oesophageal varices (EV) and liver fibrosis is necessary. We performed a cohort study in a single tertiary care centre in order to devise a simple index reflecting EV and liver fibrosis. We derived an index reflecting EV which resulted from portal hypertension (the first part) and evaluated the index's ability to detect liver fibrosis which resulted in portal hypertension (the second part). Five hundred fifty-six patients (the first part, n = 409, mean age = 55.4 years, EV prevalence = 34.0%; the second part, n = 147, mean age = 48.8 years, cirrhosis prevalence = 12.9%) with virus-related CLD were included. P2/MS [(platelet count [10(9)/L])(2)/(monocyte fraction [%] x segmented neutrophil fraction [%])] was derived to detect EV. The area under the receiver-operating characteristic curve (AUROC) of P2/MS was 0.916 (95% confidence interval, 0.879-0.954) for detecting EV, and 0.905 (0.862-0.947) for detecting high-risk EV (grade >or= II or with red colour signs). P2/MS had AUROCs of 0.952 (0.904-0.999) and 0.873 (0.792-0.955) for histological cirrhosis (METAVIR F4) and significant fibrosis (METAVIR F2-F4), respectively, which were significantly greater than those of AST-to-platelet count ratio index (0.658, P < 0.001; 0.644, P = 0.003) and FIB-4 (0.776, P = 0.031; 0.707, P = 0.026). The predictive values of P2/MS were maintained at similar accuracy in subsequent validation sets. Our study suggests that P2/MS comprising only the complete blood count results is an efficient and noninvasive marker reflecting the presence of EV and the grade of liver fibrosis in patients with virus-related CLD. An independent external validation of P2/MS is required.Prediction severity of esophageal varices: a new cutoff point for Platelet count/ spleen diameter ratio.It is currently recommended that all patients with liver cirrhosis undergo upper gastrointestinal endoscopy (UGIE) to identify those who have esophageal varices (EV) that carry a high risk of bleeding and may benefit from prophylactic measures. In the future, this social and medical burden will increase due to the greater number of patients with chronic liver disease and their improved survival. The aim of this paper was assess value of platelet count/spleen diameter ratio (PC/SD ratio) for the prediction or screening of EV in cirrhotic patients.In this two years prospective study, patients with liver cirrhosis referred to Al -Zahra hospital enrolled. Patients underwent detailed clinical examination, blood tests (hematology, liver function tests) and ultrasonography. Size of esophageal varices was assessed at UGIE; Paquet's grades 0-III were classified as group A (0-I; No or Mild EV) and group B (II-III; Moderate to severe EV). PC/SD ratio was also measured as possible noninvasive predictive/screening tools. Degree of eEV was assessed at UGIE. The relationship of the presence and degree of EVs with PC/SD ratio was evaluated.Fifty consecutive cirrhotic patients (mean age+/-SD) was 52.1 (+/-16.2); 41 male and 9 female) were enrolled; nineteen 19 (38%) patients were placed in group A (No or mild EV) while 31 (62%) had endoscopic evidence of moderate to severe EV (group B). PC/SD ratio cut off value of 921 had 93% negative predictive value. PC/SD ratio found to be significantly (P<0.05) different between group of A and B.The PC/SD ratio is independently associated with the presence of EV and can predict its severity in patients with cirrhosis. Use of this cost effective parameter may help identify patients with mild or no EV who may not need UGIE to reduce costs and discomfort for these patients and the burden on health system.External validation of the platelet count/spleen diameter ratio for the diagnosis of esophageal varices in hepatitis C virus-related cirrhosis.Screening for esophageal varices (EV) is an important part of the diagnostic workup of cirrhotic patients.To independently validate the use of the platelet count/spleen diameter ratio for the non-invasive diagnosis of EV in patients with HCV-related cirrhosis and in a sub-group of patients with compensated disease.A platelet count/spleen diameter ratio cut-off value of 909 was evaluated for the diagnosis of EV in the whole population (n = 311) and in patients with compensated disease alone (n = 114). Compensated disease was defined as the absence of ascites as detected by abdominal ultrasound in patients who are not on diuretics and absence of hepatic encephalopathy.In the whole cohort (EV prevalence 49.5%), the platelet count/spleen diameter ratio 909 cut-off value had 96.9% positive predictive value, 100% negative predictive value, and 98.4% efficiency for EV diagnosis. In compensated cirrhotics (EV prevalence 26.3%), the platelet count/spleen diameter ratio 909 cut-off showed an excellent negative predictive value (100%) and a positive predictive value of 93.8%. for the diagnosis of EV.In patients with HCV-related cirrhosis, the platelet count/spleen diameter may be proposed as a non-invasive tool for EV diagnosis, especially in financially deprived developing countries.[Evaluation of the diagnostic test of index platelet counts / size spleen, as a predictor of the presence of esophageal varices in cirrhosis].To evaluate the platelet count/spleen diameter (PC/SD) ratio as a non invasive diagnostic test to predict esophageal varices (VE) in patients with cirrhosis.Diagnostic test study, retrospective analysis. Data was collected from patients with diagnosis of liver cirrhosis at gastrointestinal unit of Hospital Nacional Daniel Alcides Carrión between September 2010 and January 2011. Using a PC/SD ratio with a cut off value of 909, sensitivity, specificity, Positive and negative predictive values, positive and negative likelihood ratios were calculate.There were 47 patients; mean age of 60,74; etiology: alcoholic (25,5%); undeterminated (48,9%). Twenty-five percent patients had varices and 74,5% had no varices. The PC/SD ratio had a sensitivity of 40%, specificity of 75%, PPV of 82%, NPV 30%, LR (+) of 1,6 and LR (-) of 0,8.The PC/SD ratio was not an effective diagnostic test for esophageal varices.Risk factors for the presence of varices in cirrhotic patients without a history of variceal hemorrhage.Current medical management dictates that all cirrhotic patients without a history of variceal hemorrhage undergo endoscopic screening to detect large varices. However, referral for endoscopic screening of only patients at highest risk for varices may be most cost-effective. The aim of this case-control study was to identify clinical, laboratory, and radiologic findings that predict the presence of varices in patients with cirrhosis.Three hundred patients without a history of variceal hemorrhage underwent upper endoscopy as part of an evaluation before liver transplantation. Cases defined as the presence of any varices and cases defined as the presence of large varices were used for examining the risks associated with finding varices on upper endoscopy. Logistic regression was performed to evaluate associations between the presence of varices and patient characteristics.Platelet count and Child-Pugh class were independent risk factors for the presence of any varices and the presence of large varices. For the presence of any varices, a platelet count of 90 x 10(3)/microL or less (odds ratio [OR], 2.4; 95% confidence interval [CI], 1.4-4.0) and advanced Child-Pugh class (OR, 3.0; 95% CI, 1.6-5.6) were independent risk factors. For large varices, a platelet count of 80 x 10(3)/microL or less (OR, 2.3; 95% CI, 1.4-3.9) and advanced Child-Pugh class (OR, 2.8; 95% CI, 1.3-5.8) were independent risk factors associated with varices.Low platelet count and advanced Child-Pugh class were associated with the presence of any varices and with large varices. These factors allow identification of a subgroup of cirrhotic patients who would benefit most from referral for endoscopic screening for varices.Can we consider the right hepatic lobe size/albumin ratio a noninvasive predictor of oesophageal varices in hepatitis C virus-related liver cirrhotic Egyptian patients?The current guidelines recommend the screening of all cirrhotic patients by endoscopy, but repeated endoscopic examinations are unpleasant for patients and have a high cost impact and burden on endoscopic units. The aim of this study is to evaluate the optimal liver lobe size/albumin ratio and to compare this ratio with spleen size, platelet count and platelet count/spleen diameter ratio as potential noninvasive predictors of oesophageal varices in hepatitis C virus (HCV)-related liver cirrhosis in Egyptian patients.This prospective study included one hundred patients with HCV-related liver cirrhosis. All studied subjects underwent a detailed clinical examination, biochemical workup, upper gastrointestinal endoscopy and abdominal ultrasound. The platelet count/spleen diameter ratio and the right liver lobe/albumin concentration ratio for all patients were calculated.The 4 predictors demonstrated a high statistically significant correlation with the presence and grade of oesophageal varices (P values<0.001). The platelet count/spleen diameter ratio had the highest accuracy, followed by the right liver lobe/albumin concentration ratio, spleen size and then platelet count.The use of the studied noninvasive predictors, especially the platelet count/spleen diameter ratio and the right liver lobe/albumin concentration ratio, can help physicians by restricting the use of endoscopic screening only to patients presenting a high probability of oesophageal varices. This is especially useful in clinical settings where resources are limited and endoscopic facilities are not present in all areas. Such is the case in Egypt, where there is a large number of patients who require oesophageal screening for oesophageal varices.